Be nice to the pregnant woman in the airport this weekend.
were talking about a strange unexplained phenomenon they called, Synesthesia, that affects a very small segment of the population. These people are born with some “wires crossed” you might say. Their senses are jumbled in a strange way so that they might taste words or hear music notes as colors. I took the mystery a
Another method is to look at the market salaries and compensation packages currently paid to very senior lawyers and attorneys below equity partner level. New incoming equity partners or members would start at a base salary level around the same as the salary level as a salaried partner, and the base levels would rise proportionately from there for all other equity partners.
So there I sat at my desk thinking that there was no way I could handle working with her anymore. I was exhausted, tearful, verging on suicidal. My body had almost given up. I wanted out of my life. I could easily have just curled up in a ball and refused to move or speak. Let someone else take care of me if they want me in their life so much. I clock-watched for the rest of the morning. Each five-minute period more painfully slowly. I told myself to wait it out til the end.
and I've lost 20 lbs doing it,
Then a few years ago papercrafters really got excited about Copic products. So I have slowly become a papercrafter as well, and now for my freelance artwork I illustrate stamps for Our Craft Lounge (you can read that story here).
I have softened my stance on that over the years. Game meat is the ultimate free range meat and is leaner than the grain-fed bloated beasts in the supermarket. Even though the concept of hunting for sport (versus hunting for the procurement of food - and yes I know the two are not mutually exclusive) still makes me twitchy, I'm far more tolerant of the idea of eating the spoils.
Now, don't be disheartened if you didn't win. Later in the year, I'm giving away a B&N Nook. So visit often for news of the contest.
“I hate you. I wish you was dead.”
Paring knife
Although the footage does not capture the true beauty of the reefs, it gives a glimpse of their majesty. And the reefs around Cozumel are truly magnificent. Towering coral formations – caves, pillars, overhangs – complete with an amazing diversity of life including countless species of coral, sponges, zoanthids, crustaceans, fishes, turtles, sharks. Long spindly legged arrow crabs, huge file fish, tiny anemone shrimp and throngs of juvenile wrasse kept us company as we drifted the reefs and wove through the complex system of swim throughs. I even saw something that I had never before seen: a Splendid Toadfish. These funky looking creatures are thought to be endemic to Cozumel, which explains why I was so excited about the first one I found. I made Chucho come look at it, smiling wide and shrugging my shoulders as to say “I have no idea!” he pointed to his temple and then motioned as though turning pages in a book: “remember, we’ll look it up”. I had found something totally novel and after swimming a few feet I saw it again. And again. Those bearded toadfish made an appearance on nearly every dive after that point. The real treat was seeing the whole fish, as they usually hide their backsides in crevices. Chucho wrastled one out of its hole for a photo shoot and I was delighted to see that the rest of the toadfish was as spiffy as promised.
I've been meaning to get this posted for AGES but never seemed to manage to wade through all the photos to organize them. We've got these short little hedges in the front of our house that are nearly perfect for a doll-size hedge maze, so I've had the idea of doing a maze photo shoot. I took a ton of pictures but finally managed to pared it down to my favorites.
Now I'm thinking, if I want a narrower back piece, I should just cut 1/2 inch off the sides of either end, below the armscye. There's a bit about this in my Singer book, The Perfect Fit. I'll explore this further later to today. I don't think darts are what I want. David Coffin thinks that darts are "merely evidence of ill-cut side seams" (p. 21) Hmm....
we were participating in,
was the friendly touch.
The way Margaret explores so many differing themes throughout her writing is another thing that appeals to me and she delves within one of my favourite genres – speculative fiction. Of course, it will take me some time to read all of her work so I have some rules.
Let’s return to our stricken vessel off the coast of Malta. Why did they cast four anchors out of the stern? Remember it was night time. They were approaching an unknown shore. No one knew if there were rocks along that shore that would break up the ship. They were seeing the words of Paul coming true. They had a choice to simply obey or try and get themselves out of the danger. As we go through life we continually must make choices and this is what they had to do. Paul knew the end result of the journey and God was working all things out. It had to be this way so that God’s power could be revealed. God had to show them that His grace was sufficient and all things would work together for good.
This explanation of the crime also lends new credence to the dying words of Frank Gusenberg, one of the seven men killed in the attack, who, lying in a pool of blood, said, “Cops did it.” Two of the men seen entering the garage that cold February day to perpetrate the attack were wearing police uniforms. And even if they weren’t real cops, White could have easily obtained uniforms from his police sergeant uncle or numerous other crooked cops. White was known to have disguised himself and a cohort as police officers at least once before — for a hit job in 1926.
Enables Inoue Jun to feel the flow of the other players and end up knowing when your opponent is going to win and block them appropriately and messing up their flow. Again this can be countered by online mahjong-ers who do not believe in this kind of mumbo jumbo. Also can be defeated by someone who reads the game better than you.
and though we’d be together,
“Our sources put the number of slain somewhere around fifteen,” Satele answered.
Anyway. I'm sorry we're not on the air. But I'm not just sorry. I'm also in excruciating pain.
It's 2.18pm as I write this but I can already hear firecrackers and other gun powder-powered explosives going off around my neighbourhood. It's Chinese New Year again and the Year of the Rabbit is departing us and the Year of the Dragon is incoming.
Your majesty's good thoughts away from me!
I might be busy writing cover copy or additional info for sales sheets or maybe a piece of passion for a website like lovereading4kids or a letter to bookseller.
5. And the very last thing, yesterday the Hubs picked up a present for ‘Timan’ at the post office. It’s from my parents and it’s a new DVD with the ‘Cars’ characters. The tot will be beside himself with joy when I’m going to give it to him Sunday morning. I hope this will buy me some quiet time this weekend after all, in spite of the little one skipping naps.
To turn these diseases around or stop their progression, how about some non-processed wholesome non-GMO foods. And due to the lack of nutritional value of our foods we now have to supplement with mineral, vitamin amino acid and essential fatty acids in proper amounts for our body weight before we get sick. Or take enough of these supplements to help us eliminate the root cause of the illness and give our bodies the raw materials to heal!
Gregory: the GOP said they want Obama to
Following on from that, I thought I’d make the skirt to go with it, out of some sheerish black fabric I got from Peterborough market. I used the skirt bit from Butterick 4790, cos it’s really full, and managed to get it on one bit of fabric – I did cut down one side because it needs a zip. The zip went in perfectly. The waist is only a little too big. The hem is all over the place. It’s currently on the dummy, waiting to see how much more on the piss the hem will be before I can actually sort it out – bummer is that the shorter bits are a bit too short. Gah.
What piece of advice can you give to other companies who want to apply to compete in Cupid’s Cup next year?
3. You control the sweetness of the jam
Hey, I know I ain't alone and I also know that you guys do hear, and prolly have had yer own silent screams runnin' around in yer noggin's.
For as long as Esmerine can remember, she has longed to join her older sister, Dosinia, as a siren--the highest calling a mermaid can have. Then Dosinia runs away to the mainland, and Esmerine is sent to retrieve her. Using magic to transform her tail into legs, she makes her way unsteadily to the capital city. There she comes upon a friend she hasn't seen since childhood--a dashing young man named Alandare, who belongs to a winged race of people. As Esmerine and Alandare band together to search for Dosinia, they rekindle a friendship . . . and ignite the emotions for a love so great it cannot be bound by sea, land, or air.
They were as fine as cream gravy. The two ladies looked like they were from the Old States... High-falutin. He watched them eat lunch -- one had a BLT and the other had some lemon meringue pie.
Anna Brown went to the emergency room at St. Mary’s on September 21, 2001, complaining of pain so severe in her legs that she could not stand. Ms. Brown had already sought help at 2 other area hospitals and was turned away. This time, desperate for relief from her agony, she refused to leave.
“As a result of his efforts, he helped increase QVC’s program distribution – with the ultimate goal of making QVC available in every household in the United States.”
Yeah, well, guess who I just heard back from.
ta da!
Somethings to point out about active recovery:
And look at this big beautiful clear font inside on the PERFECT white pages! ^_^
Oh, sorry. Where was I? Oh right, quality time with the kid.
I am sad to see her go.
12But the open country round the town, and its unwalled places, they gave to Caleb, the son of Jephunneh, as his property.
This postmodern view of the truth might carry some way with the Group of 88 (did Harr seek to consult “law professor” Karla Holloway in his effort?) but has little bearing in the actual world of the law. As occurs throughout his motions, Harr cites no case law to sustain his novel legal theory. But he does employ it to suggest that Smith must recuse himself from Mangum’s trial.
Here is some school band humor for you…
existence is the basic form of participation in & definition of a reality
“I’m sssorry, I didn’t mean to, you know, run into you . . .”
And You And I
I definately think I've got the dressmaking bug again. I even thought I might search about for a mannequin to help me get my sizing right then there might be a few less cock-ups.
Chartier also talked about how HC and its teams are constantly in the know on what college women are interested in visually. They post new banners at the top of the website almost weekly or monthly depending on holidays or if they launched a new partnership. When they announced a month and a half ago that HC had joined with Contiki, a college aged travel company, to begin a partnership, they had a new banner up that day. They are definitely on top of their game when it comes to their audience. There is almost nothing on their website that I myself, as a college aged woman, am not interested in, at least a little bit. This is why I believe they are so successful and keep moving up the latter each day.
News has reached me of a further farm killing earlier this month. News reports have so far been very limited, and there is nothing that I can find in the English language press. However, according to the Afrikaner press four Mozambicans have been arrested in Soweto following the gruesome murder of a 50 year old farmer at his small holding near Meyerton in South Africa's Gauteng province.
For what Melis knows about the deep-sea mystery is only part of a nightmarish past torn by violence. She thought she had put that past behind her when she arrived at her Carribbean island home to research dolphin behavior.
Next, measure out your liquid. This will be double the amount of oats that you put in your bowl. Now, this is where you can start to get creative. Most of the time I just combine 1/2 cup of oats with 1 cup of water, but you could do 1/2 cup of milk (almond, cow, soy, etc…) with 1/2 cup of yogurt for extra thick and creamy overnight oats. You could even use some pasturized egg whites to get some protein. Do whatever your taste buds desire!
Second, there's the normal act of viewing anything. We naturally fill in what we cannot see. A close-up does not eradicate the rest of the actor. Similarly any other characters in the scene are still "there," even if they aren't visually apparent. Rooms have four walls even if we can only see three, and they definitely have ceilings.
asthma in his first physical examination last February.
I kept her reports, keep them still, in a secure place should anything arise.
Mary: What is the hardest part of writing for you?
Not that I want them to be putting out JYP jams, necessarily. Musically T-ara has been divine; it’s just what’s being done to them humanly (and now, to the band as a whole) that’s intolerable.
One of the most notable quotes of Omar Bongo was: “Gabon without France is like a car with no driver. France without Gabon is like a car with no fuel”. That is how Bongo saw the corrupt relationship that existed between him and his international friends in France.
The PRC sales assistant was serving a Singaporean customer who requested a product not available in the shop after which he asked to see the manage and he replied:
Today, we’ll be washing away your tears from all late nights that you’ve cried over a boy/ or girl who will never as much look at you because you’re physically unattractive. But thats okay my little darling piece of tofu because you’ve started something special. Starting today you will be baptized and reborn as a new more confident better looking version of yourself.
It is written:
Summarized what will be the effect of both ideas (from last week and this)? Only if you are able to draw interest your course will be in everybody’s mouth. Only when you manage to engage people you are able to create emotions. Golfers talk about your course, about the experiences they made, about the hospitality. And you are perfect when you gather all these emotions upfront and after such an event on various social media platforms.
Now what they need to do is give out the sheet music to classic hiphop samples...
Things look good for Newt. He has the lead, his support seems to have more room to grow than Romney’s, and so far he’s not seeing any ill effects from his ex-wife going to the media. It’s important to note though that many average South Carolina voters- the non-political junkies- will get their first exposure to the Marianne Gingrich story in the morning paper or on the news sometime tomorrow. That may or may not end up having a big impact on his numbers. But it’s important to keep in mind.
- Move to Kenya in October!
1 large can pumpkin (not pie mix)
Mind Waves attended the Digitally Agile Scotland seminar on 29 March, at the Scottish Youth Theatre in Glasgow. We joined a host of community organisations to share ideas about how we can use social media effectively. Thirty delegates took part in a mix of team discussions and talks, throughout a packed day. The event highlighted the crucial role that digital tools play now, in community engagement.
A French “exotic dancer” has been causing a stir in Australia. In a land where naked Sheilas are generally applauded, Alizee Sery has been winning hearts and loins all over the rugged continent. The miners and sheep-shearers were particularly impressed by the exhibition of her art.
Still I Dream of It (1976 home recording)
A Surprise Say it With Letters piece from Deb Approx $7-$15. Here is an example that has been altered. The Sky is the limit with these wonderful blank pieces.
hope you come back and visit again soon ♥
Yes indeed, we went to the Exeter farmers' market this afternoon, and Heron Pond Farm had greenhouse-grown tomatoes! They also had strawberries, which we didn't get since we have some of our own growing outside (though ours aren't red yet) - but it was nice to see such treats this early in the Spring!
performances all through the
So it was a dislike of the arbitrary and minimally restrained exercise of political power (such as is seen in tyranny, authoritarianism, totalitarianism, absolute monarchy, the socialism of the French revolution etc.) over the individual that was at the heart of all that Burke advocated. As previously noted, it was not remotely contradictory for him to be both a conservative and a great advocate of reform. What mattered was the DIRECTION of the reform -- towards greater individual liberty and liberation from government power. Burke CARED about the oppressed people of his day and argued their cause.
A little tip next..
This one is about artificial reproductive technologies, and was delivered to a class of nursing students in their medical ethics class. Timely – because the Democrats just rescinded conscience protections for medical workers.
cancer and is dying? Are you open at all to letting him say good-bye
Hackensack River, DeKorte Park, The Meadowlands
throw in the third verse of a hymn every other chapter and quote the Gospel of
do something dangerous, and I realized I needed a gut check. Yes, I
M.Alice begins her takedown during class assembly hitting Marshall with nuclear-level humiliation by way of a hacked presentation and damning photographic evidence of Marshall’s loser-dom (two words: superhero underwear). Then she gets personal and steals his clarinet. His only chance to find it and get to jazz band on time is to overcome the class bully, survive gym, and solve the riddle she left in his empty instrument case. When your evil sister promises to ruin your life, believe her.
That above statement has always been in the back of my mind ever since I was a little girl. It has always been a dream somewhere in me. It has always been more or less wishful thinking, but never something I actively worked toward making happen – because I was not ready for marriage.
she’s one of the members from HongKong girl
Now, if only I can be equally victorious once we’re in Germany!
YELLOW REECES EGGS
Once we left the Chevrolet service center, we went to do a little grocery shopping and I found a place to get a haircut.
Yesterday’s post traced events between March 16 and March 26, when the Duke administration possessed considerable freedom of action.
This was an outfit that really deserved a better setting in which to be photographed - maybe a field of wildflowers instead of a backdrop of a snowy mountain, since it was about 65 degrees outside when we took them. I talk about the weather a lot on my blog, don't I? I guess I'm just an old lady at heart. I like to stay at home and knit, I grumble about skateboarders and technology, and the weather is honestly one of my favorite topics of conversation.
I never got into this BURN thing to see fruit – I burn because I have to, it’s what I was made to do, and because He deserves all of me and all that’s in me. But, every now and again, it’s only human to wonder if what you’ve given your life for is having the desired effect. At the time, I couldn’t see it – even though I knew that I’d discerned a shift in the Spirit only a month before, I couldn’t see it with my eyes.
This morning I lay in bed and watched the sun rise, one of my favourite artist dates.
but baby I love it,
Two albums, “Miles Davis at Fillmore” and the sound track for the documentary film “Jack Johnson,” have been released since “Bitches Brew,” but neither shows signs of doing as well commercially. This of course provides an incentive to make the next release particularly interesting, and it looks as if “Live and Evil” (one word is the reverse spelling of the other) will be just that. Scheduled for a December release, it is the distillation of ten to fifteen reels of tape, selected from an original working pile of thirty reels. “The album is partly live, and it has an ethereal evil, where the mind is clouded and all these things are happening,” says Macero, “it’s like a wild dream.” Artist Mati Klarwein, who was responsible for the unusual “Bitches Brew” cover, has been commissioned to give the new album a similar look.
"I can't find my reefer," said Tom disjointedly.
I was distracted later by C. repelling my mildly-friendly overtures, we were dating brothers after all, they would take us places and then proceed to ignore us. ”Get used to this” I smiled, trying to be open. ”She looked down at nose at me, “Oh I love watching them” I smiled. Whatever, yes because people like to be ignored.
OK....
In 1855 New York City, brothel owner Mrs. Beale sells children to her patrons. A fire guts her place just before the latest auction. Father O’Rourke finds twelve year old Cathleen Donavon in a nearby alley. He takes her to a friend Judge and Mrs. Throckmorten.
Noise Isolating Earbuds Vs Noise Cancelling Headphones
He was co-author of the original "I, Robot", which was adapted into not one but two different episodes of The Outer Limits. Although some UFOlogists have often labeled him a "NASA insider" --a claim debunked by James "Truculent Walrus" Oberg and never claimed by Binder himself-- the writer's resume is extraordinary nonetheless.
and when I swing my feet to the floor
(John 10:25-27 (NIV))
What I want you to notice about the completed fairy in this picture is the shadow on the skin. This was made with RV95, not a darker skin sequence. Please remember where I have mentioned in the past that your skin has a slighty purple/blue shadow. This grayish purple is perfect for shading skin and getting a pale, translucent feel to the delicate fairy.
plus if you wnat to donate then there is a link on his site for that too
To round out the design, I added a few blasts of a blue Copic marker with my airbrush to give a puffy cloud/blue sky kind of Spring day. Is anyone else ready for Spring? It's not been quite evident in St. Louis lately... but I'm VERY ready!
And he even had some success. By 1939 he had doubled Italy's grain production from its traditional level, enabling Italy to cut wheat imports by 75% (Smith, 1967, p. 92). As with all autarkist nonsense however, the price was high. The extra grain could be produced only at high cost so Italians now had to pay twice as much for their grain. But what anti-globalizer would worry about that?
V) To Anticipate Women Dominating Society
As of tomorrow at 10 a.m., I will be done with school and there will be no more excuses for being bitter or disinterested. The past is the past and these are the Stanley Cup playoffs. It’s the best time of the year and I’m going to enjoy it. And hey, not watching much all season could make this more fun with more games being shocking to me than others.
And after we arrived at one point, we looked back and found out that our coach was left at the back. We are so damn worried and freaked out all the way! Where is she? Of course at the back. So when we caught the man cycling uphill, we stopped him and asked “Did you see any lady at the back?“
1/2 tsp. Grey Poupon
There were some tragedies along the way, yes. We will always remember the brave astronauts who lost their lives aboard Challenger and Columbia. But the fact that only two shuttle missions out of 135 resulted in loss of life shows a remarkable safety record.
It would hardly be fair of me to ask you to scrutinize your Outer Spaz and honestly evaluate your apparent flaws without me doing the same. The difference is I’m going to do it here, publicly, for the whole world to see. Or at least the handful of you out there reading this.
Students with valid ID: $15 rush 15 minutes before curtain
Spectrum Noir markers
These figures are thrown into even more sharp relief when we consider that in 1979, a year that history will come to judge as the all-time high water mark of the British pub trade, there were 37 million bulk barrels sold. The current figure is only 38% of that. The off-trade has taken up some of the slack, growing on average by 2.6% over the past thirteen years, but even so has only put back 3.6 million of the 11.4 million barrels lost by pubs, and has actually lost ground too in the recent recession.
Savvy Verse and Wit is host of a poetry blog tour in honor of National Poetry Month 2012. I'll be making the tour in April, visiting the host bloggers who will have a post up during the month on poetry, poets, etc. Click on her link to visit during the month.
I sat in the middle of the couch with the long coffee table parallel to it in front of me. My injured foot was propped up on a pillow on the table to my far left. My normal leg was positioned the same way to my right. Slowly, I’d lean toward each side with my arm outstretched in front of me, toward my foot, or over my head. I’d relax back to take a break, then tuck in my tummy, sit up, and repeat. It helped take the pressure off my lower spine and loosen my shoulders, in addition to stretching my legs and arms.
"Maybe having lived through the 70’s is preventing Roger from seeing the difference between a poor beer being put into a keg and a great beer being put into a keg. GARBAGE IN, GARBAGE OUT. A brilliant beer doesn’t become poor just because it’s put into a keg.
His wife Mabel, just before beginning a relationship with the Dutch Al Capone, became (1997) director of the Brussels-based Open Society Institute, a play toy of billionaire-investor (and prominent Bilderberger) George Soros. Until recently she worked for this organization form its London office. Everything that is known about Mabel however points in just one direction: unbridled promiscuity.
I made this recipe for a school pot luck, and it was a big hit, so I thought I'd post it for anyone who wants to give it a try. I'd never made it before but I thought it was delicious. If you like peanut butter and cheesecake you'll love it.
(A Rumbling of Things Unknown,Jacqueline Rose on Marylin Monroe)
Anyway hopefully the more I post the better it will get and the more I will get from writing it. I’m also just about to start a new role as a senior library assistant. I could really do with some help and guidance as it’s my first time in a senior position.
Who kept hearing God whisper Uganda but tried to ignore Him? This sister.
After we picked my dad up from the airport, I started sorting my clothes, since I need to pack! We're heading to our cottage Saturday, that day is very rapidly approaching, and we are most certainly not ready!
I pulled into the parking lot of the apartment building and was met by a young man that seemed to tower over everyone around him. This guy was at least 6'10" tall and I'm pretty sure his knuckles dragged on the ground as he walked towards my cab.
We walked several blocks looking at stars--
My next article will be called "Why Africa Will Die" and I'll be posting links to a number of articles that speak to the forthcoming article. The following is one such article.
By 2017, HP hopes to build a computer chip that includes 256 microprocessors tied together with beams of light.
Next, in contrast, I was driving and heard this song by the popular Christian singer Amy Grant called, “Better than Hallelujah“. I was disgusted by the lyrics, but the DJ who played it said these lyrics have ministered to thousands of Christians. What bothered me was the refrain where she says:
And is luck only measured by winning money.
And I smashed that glass right in her face.
The Beastie Boys+
stands.
10. Sunny Days - Lighthouse
As I said before, and in what is essentially the whole point of this piece, all of this, even in the traditional, melodic feel of old world Japan and the classic Japanese cinema of Ozu and Mizoguchi, is pure 1950's Sirkian melodrama. The way Ichikawa lights his film, the movement of his camera, the natural beauty juxtaposed with the inner turmoil of his characters is all Sirk. Now I am not saying Ichikawa's film was necessarily influenced by films such as Written on the Wind or A Time To Live and a Time to Die, or for that matter the works of Nick Ray or Richard Quine or even Satyajit Ray, which also bear resemblance here (Ichikawa, who started as an animator, considered himself a cartoonist at heart and Chaplin and Disney were his biggest influences) but the feel of the film still conjures up memories of this bold, oft-maligned cinema of the past.
clouds of smoke,
William then says he wants to throw a going-away party, and writes Lasher a $500 check. As Lasher is claiming the party will go down in "Hyde Park history," Jane comes in (unnoticed) and asks, "What party?"
What types of yoga are best for fat burning?
1 keys
A guest blog post by True Meadows
Maybe sometimes, we feel afraid, but it's alright
But I was curious, why do we have this urge to get new clothes for Easter? Growing up my mother always got us a new “dressy” outfit for Easter. Sometimes even a hat for me. Even when my mother was growing up, and she was what some would consider poor at times, there was always at least new shoes for Easter.
The Rewards
Secondly, time. Most of us visit and comment on a lot of blogs, and thoughtful critiquing takes time. It's much easier to say something nice and move on than it is to give detailed feedback, especially if it's a long passage.
India: A young woman was attacked and thrown out of her home “for daring to give thanks for healing in Christ’s name” in a predominantly Muslim village; “her parents helped Islamic extremists to beat her nearly unconscious“: In a village where “hard-line Muslims have threatened to kill the 25 families who initially showed interest in Christ, leaving only five frightened Christian families,” the woman was attacked when returning from church, and called “pagan, among other verbal abuses.” The mob also harassed and threatened the Christian woman who had allegedly “lured” her to convert to Christianity.
So strange how the comic was bought by a someone who was interested in comics But didn't do much with it..I feel they underused the comic artists talent a lot of the remaining comic artists could and wished to draw more But replaced with reprints. What a waste of there talent.
Rebecca Mcmeen: Batiste
On Monday, still no box of checks, but I received and deposited the replacement check for $265. I discovered the downside to the check card because I could not use it for daycare tuition and after-school care, as they are both old-fashioned institutions and require checks. On Tuesday I discovered that, again!, that the replacement check has been "returned" and now I have a hold on my checking account for $530. Luckily, payday had come and gone, so I had some wiggle room. But still!
Black juniper cones, icy ferns, pine needles, and a crush of cloves.
Writing Home, and Untold Stories (Alan Bennett)
I decided I'd like to attend it -
NOTE: I changed this month to masking only. (4/5/10)
Whole Collection
There really is nothing more important to me than striving to be a good human being. So, to be here tonight and be acknowledged as the first to receive this honor is beyond expression in words for me. ‘I am a human being, nothing human is alien to me.’ Terence said that in 154 B.C. and when I first read it many years ago, I had no idea of the depth of that meaning.
And Friday is my in town birthday party. I should be a fun time. I have a dear friend coming into town for the party. I can't wait.
Back in October, we had an Indian Summer with lots of beautiful and warm weather (20° C/ 68°F).
We’ve all heard the truism: You have no privacy, get over it. Well, we have.
This is virtually what God said in Romans 12:1. The divine command is to “present your bodies a living sacrifice, holy, acceptable unto God, which is your reasonable service.” This would necessitate our abstaining from all appearances of evil, those things, which do harm to our bodies such as drugs, tobacco or any form of excess.
O'erbear the shores of my mortality,
And what is her home?
A couple of years ago I probably would have cited Guinness as my guilty secret but then I started doing the drunk diary in January and it quickly became apparent that I drank a lot of Guinness for want of any decent beer on the bar.
1. just go ahead and shop at:
We should be careful that we are not choosing for a money making ‘so called’ “Democracy” that is in favor of intrest and maximum gain profit, without counting the human factor. The freedom of Free speech is important for everybody. Even when we have to face that certain things we do not agree with are written so that everybody can read them. We should give everybody also the freedom to choose what they want to read and how they want to interpret it. Though we do agree there are certain limitations like pornographic material and extreme violence which should be filtered down.
Smiling, Ella folds April to her chest. “I love your little inquisitive mind. Asking questions is a good thing. It’s how you learn. Now tell me what had you thinking about Tucker and your brothers.”
money where the punks be
Exclude all posts related to: my etsy shop, my photography business, other bloggers, contests, product reviews
At the moment, Josh and I are happy wanderers getting ready for a big adventure.
I could ride a beach cruiser to the farmers markets ever Saturday with to die for produce.
“We are open to new suggestions from our authors and hope that every new author to join us will bring with them their knowledge, experiences and pitfalls, which in turn will help us build a reputable and successful Company.”
Let's look from both sides:
about 15 or 16 small items in all.
*Alcohol does not freeze so it adds to the softer, creamier consistency of the ice cream. Adding a tad more, like I did, at 8 tablespoons, might get you really super soft ice cream, that melts quicker. Use your judgement and take into account your preferences.
But just barely! I took my design wall photo earlier today while I actually worked on the project up there! For a whole hour! But that was only after cleaning up the three year old's room and putting some laundry away, and before making lunch and teaching a science club class after school, making dinner, ruining 4 petri dishes - tell me what good are petri dishes you can't sterilize by boiling? - replacing said petri dishes at the local school supply store and filling 6 of them with nutrient agar all the while coaching an 8 year old through the design of an 'incubator' made out of a cardboard box, a heating pad and a wireless thermometer that usually lives on the front porch and tells me if the kids need a coat before heading to the bus in the morning. Wow, that was an impressive run-on sentence! This project is on my quarterly To-Do list for the Finish Along, so I am proud that I am actually working on it. Sadly, I thought I needed only two more blocks and maybe some borders but...
This way, termed ‘non-violent communication,’ means that no one gets offended and your relationship remains the same. It’s all about the self-control. We all need to let off some steam now again, but you can control the aftermath.
The second series debuts today. See:
it doesn’t fit any more,
This is a drink that I remember my mom making for us before bed. It is a simple flavored milk, that I am happy to give my son. I typically serve this in the morning or before bed, but you can enjoy it anytime. This is also a great way to use bananas that are a bit past their prime (we are pretty picky banana eaters in our house, once they are speckled brown we don't usually eat them whole). You can warm your milk during the cooler months for a delicious warm drink.
Energy: When gas prices hit $4 a gallon in 2008, candidate Barack Obama said it was due to previous failed energy policies. Now that prices are heading still higher, President Obama calls it progress.
I’m currently working on a USA TV series called ‘Common Law’. It’s about two cops, partners, who do not get along. They are forced into couples therapy by their captain to work out their troubles. I play Peter, who is part of one of the couples in therapy. It’s a really funny show with a great cast. Michael Ealy and Warren Kole are the leads. They are really good together. Also, stars Jack McGee and Sonya Walger. It’s gonna be a fantastic show. It premieres Jan. 26th.
2.Cut the corn from the cobs into a large bowl, and scrape the stripped cobs with the back of the knife (or a spoon) to release the juices into the bowl.
Dir/Prod/Writ; Mariusz Cwynar, Co-Prod; Mouine Omari, Co-Writ; Kyrstian Bernacik, 3 mins, (Manchester), 2012.
A little vintage tag for Vicki's new Cheerful Stamp Pad challenge: Tags - the interpretation is yours .... a little tag, a big tag, a tag book, ..... endless possibilities
I’ve been thinking too much about Ruby’s character and what the character may mean, about the feeling I have when I try get to know this character. The character seems tailor made for a culture obsessed with trauma and the exposing of conditions for troubled lives. The presence of the character, not quite whole and partially absent, conforms, I think, to Barthes notion of the “Return of the Author” -- the shredded ghost of a self that arrives through our interaction with a work of art. Finally, the character seems to enact the possibility that, in the words a recent Rosalind Krauss essay, that “who comes after the subject’ in society is a multiple personality.” Ruby’s character, constructed as well as written by Ruby, is stricken with the horrible illness of never being able to know itself, never being able to have enough of a handle on things to do any thing else but try to claw its way out of box it was buried in alive. So, in other words, Ruby’s character is basically perfectly in line with all the vogue horrors of a certain vision of the human self. Depressed yet. I am.
11. My mother taught me about WEATHER.
It’s not a fantasy This is right for me Living it like a star
Norfork had still be offering up some good wading water, but over the past few days we have seen some wading at Bull Shoals Dam, Wildcat and the Baxter County side of the Narrows, plus lower Rim Shoals.
V/A - They Pelted Us With Rocks and Garbage (1985, comp with Spike in Vain, Offbeats, Dark...)
Grabbed Chris some breakfast (banana and Nutrigrain bar) from the lobby stash. Started heading north along Broadway. Stopped at finish line porta-potties (because runners MUST pee again before the race) and got to the “corral” about 6:05 or so?
how much money they have it’s not that
"Philolog: Rembrandt and Ovid: The Abduction of Europa, 1632; Metamorphoses II.849-59 and the Myth Tradition." Metamedia at Stanford. Web. 02 May 2011.
Now for the freebies. I received these from the various shops either as a freebie to entice me into their shop, or as part of my GWPs. Korean shops are amazingly generous when it comes to freebies and samples. I can get loads of samples just buy buying a single item! Way to get customer loyalty!! Our local stores can really learn from their Korean counterparts on this matter! My friend even has a specific Holika Holika store she returns to each time she’s in Korea (at least twice a year) because they are the most generous when it comes to samples.
Trembling, the woman flung her hand out, grasping the hem/fringe of Jesus’ garment. Immediately, Jesus stopped in His tracks, halted by a release of His power from her grasp of faith.
de l'Isle de Sales, 3 rue d'Alger
CAPITAL ECONOMICS
The headline is to be interpreted literally, my cat scratched me on my nose today.
They never physically abused me but I had enough of the emotional abuse, especially from my father. My dad was always very critical, demeaning, cold. He'd often make fun of me, my brothers did this too a lot, and my mom would laugh along with them, treating me like my thoughts and feelings were silly, stupid, ridiculous.
Tapper: that’s hard core
Over the area spread below, the three or four millions of square
We bow our heads
Today started nice and trying to be sunny, which didn’t last. However, it didn’t rain either, so that’s a bonus. The mud is very slowly drying up, but it’s still pretty squelchy down there. Let’s hope we don’t have too many severe downpours like that again.
This card is for a friend of mine who has been struggling with a very serious illness. Despite the difficulty of her life, she is always thinking about others. Recently, she surprised me by having a bouquet of flowers delivered on my birthday. She is such a lovely person and truly a wonderful friend.
We have changed our minds on keeping it a secret for many reasons. 1. It is a VERY emotional process and the more support I feel like I have, the easier it makes it. 2. It was kind of stressing me out keeping it a secret, my body deals with stress in odd ways. I never feel like I am stressed but I will get either killer stomach and chest pains or I will get cold sores. Let’s just say I have had 6 cold sores in the last 6 months, so I must have been stressed! 3. It is like the main focus in mine and Dustin’s lives and not really talking about it was hard, especially because we are so close with our family and friends. 4. Again, because it is SO SO emotional, if anyone has ever tried for a long time to get pregnant you know exactly what I mean, and Dustin being a male, is so supportive and gets disappointed, but doesn’t quite understand how it feels as the woman. All the support from girls that have been through the same thing is the BIGGEST relief, just knowing that someone knows how I feel. 5. It will still be a surprise when I tell everyone. 6. I was turning into a crazy person, just ask Dustin, or actually don’t! I feel like us not keeping it a secret has already made a huge difference.
Here is the card I created:
And the works of His hands.
GET OUT OF THE HOUSE!!! Get out of the house before 10 am, I say to myself. That is the goal. Nearly, 10:10 and I lock the door behind me. A morning walk into downtown past old women squatting on the street shining persimmons and thrusting bags of peeled garlic into the air for me to see. Someone is behind her metal cart filling small dips in a cast iron pan with oil, dough, and bean paste. The sun is shining and I climb the stairs to step onto train yard bridge. I complete my errands and chat with Im You Hee, who wears dark blue contacts. I am back before noon and quickly out again. Werrrrrkkkk.
lol,….Well? Too extreme??? Oh,..An afterthought…You know,…Jesus had people, believers, (His disciples), move the stone away from the “opening” that led down into the grave? Right?,…
Acts 22:16
that just didn't understand why I wouldn't give them up.
I pound best pork sausages. Chipolatas or ‘normal’ will do. Usually you would get 8 normal, or 16 chipolatas to a pound. Depending on how hungry your audience is, this should feed between three and five people.
and no, not in the “HUGE” different way — in the “I never wear matching socks simply because I dont think it’s normal” way — (which I dont… never have, and never will).
You Deserve Better Than Drug Therapy Can Offer
If you have your own questions for Wallace, he’ll be calling into our History Of Mystery Class’s discussion of Richard Stark and his book The Outfit at 6PM, as he talks about Stark’s influence on his work. Also join us at 4PM for a viewing of the film version starring Robert Duvall.
The weather here has been gorgeous today, and we enjoyed a fairly long outing at Lowe's then lunch with Elizabeth and Jeff at a little cafe near our house called Duffy's, then a stroll through the beautiful plants and other gardening accouterments at a local nursery called Southwood. It is high dollar, but they do have some beautiful things.
What? I remember thinking that if they couldn’t read as fast as I could then they needed to be in another group or another class. And I remember my teacher (another friend of my parents) talking to my mother and explaining that I needed to slow down and that it wasn’t anything I’d done wrong but that she needed to help me understand that I was going to have to help “teach” the others to read.
She’s clearly read a huge array of books and enjoyed a wide-range of movies in her time. More than that, she’s been able to take all of the influences and put them together in a way that is entirely fresh and very much of her own style.
hazelnuts, pine nuts, or slivered almonds
B. Discussion: group analysis of found narratives, those we find in ourselves, & those we find around us.
This opens so many more doors for Ryan. He will continue to get all of those services he needs and we will be able to work more with the school district to make sure he is in the right spot. Our goal is a smaller special education classroom and some mainstreaming, possibly with an aid. We also have the option of looking at other schools that help kids with Autism and learning disabilities. It is good to have options.
In Himachal you can also take up venture tours of Himachal that has created a niche for itself in the world because of its adventure options. One can go to Bir and Billing for aero sports while skiing has become the most happening sport in Kufri. One can also indulge into water sports, para gliding, camping, mountaineering, golfing etc. Enjoy the various travel attractions of Himachal Pradesh while taking up adventure tourism in Himachal Pradesh. You can also take a monumental tour to Himachal Pradesh and explore the various historical structures like monumental heritage like Kangra fort and much more.
The annual observance highlights the severity of sin. It is dangerous. Sins can not be committed in a blasé manner because of the availability of the rituals which can be performed on a daily basis. The accumulation of sin through the year, jeopardising God’s maintained dwelling, must be considered.
Min Ho does not only have the looks, but I believe he also started to prove that he can REALLY act and be better at it. The kind of acting that is REAL and GENUINE, the acting that made me feel his character. Being with a top caliber actor like Son Ye Jin, it must have been tough for him. But I’m really impressed that he was able to blend well with Ye Jin and he was able to create a great onscreen chemistry with her. He successfully made every emotional scene with Ye Jin so heartfelt that just by looking through his eyes is enough to make one cry.
Me: How old?
The things I did for that cat.
Losing the pregnancy weight hasn't been as difficult as I had imagined, either! I gained 39 lbs. while pregnant and now only have 5 more to lose to get back to my beginning weight. Breastfeeding is not only great for the baby, but also for the mom! Ha!
A week of new horizons in well-known worlds provided respite and insight alike. Between daily visits to the Athenaeum I could stroll the hilly streets unencumbered, having a neighborhood place to leave bags, books, and typewriter. And I could visit with friends, without calculating a same-day return to Maine. There was plenty of time to listen well. Even my handwriting slowed down. The Athenaeum’s rare books room, open only on weekdays, was yet another place of discovery in a library I’ve known for a dozen years. After reading all I could borrow of Baxter’s in circulating collections, it was time to meet the treasures he published in his own lifetime. Requesting to use the special reading room paralleled my query for staying with the Quakers.
dreams a reality while exploring our beautiful world."
about, checking in on her new goats and sheep.. These are some of the newest additions to her flock. Their little voices and antics are irresistible.
“Who’s gonna pay for my men and balloons?” the governor asked, thinking about his budget and his financial opportunities.
....0 - SW/Sony/Kobo
If it helps you muster up some sympathy or tolerance, think about this: that family whose kid is bothering you might be on their way to or from a really sad place, like a funeral. Maybe they are all having a bad day, or a bad month. Don't add to it by being a jerk to them.
Easy peasey.
People come, people go.
But watching him play pool was more than she could take. She wasn’t nearly busy enough. It was late, the crowds had thinned, and it was mostly him and his player buddies, and if she had to wipe down another glass until it sparkled to avoid looking at his ass she was going to hurl said glass against the nearest wall.
I have a list of 27 accomplishments I am working on as requested from AJAPOPFILMS.com, so that should be up sooner than later. Hoping it doesn’t rain tonight.
The purpose of these fasts during the Chathur maasa is to gain control over our senses and purify the mind and the body.Fasting is done during this time as a preventive medicine! As said earlier , this period coincides with the monsoons and at that time our digestive powers are not at its best. The green leafy vegetables may rot due to excessive dampness. The vegetables may not grow properly due to lack of sun light. The water will be contaminated. Hence when the fast is observed, it kind of counteracts the unhealthy conditions and helps maintain a healthy body.
NONPROFITS/BUDGETS | Prince George’s County is preparing its nonprofits for fewer government funding opportunities. County Executive Rushern Baker has proposed reducing nonprofit funding by $3 million in 2013 – down from $8.2 million this year. (Examiner, 5/1)
I've been trying to transfer my blogger feed to the new site, so if any of you got this (or Friday's Foto Felicity) in your google reader today, would you please let me know?
Sunday mornings I wake up bright and early to head to Rikers Island with a group of Fordham Law School students. We volunteer with the 16-18 year old male youth that are housed in the Robert N. Davoren Complex (RNDC) at Rikers. Based on the curriculum developed by some of the law students in the Prisoners Rights Advocates group, we teach the young men about their rights with respect to the 4th, 5th, and 6th amendments. Unfortunately true to what we know and what we have been told, most of the men we’ve seen there are Black and Latino.
The Holidays are here again, and so are the holiday themed apps. Popular games like Angry Birds Seasons have been updated with Christmas levels, and there are countless holiday apps now available on the App Store. I decided to highlight a few here.
*Sun is a candidate.
I rate The Postmistress an 8 out of 10. It's a very good book.
To fear their own works? /
Uh, ok…my first thought was, “I’m still at a show for a band called Mutemath, right? Or, is old fashioned slang a new trend I missed somehow?” Randomly overhearing part of strangers’ conversation is always entertaining and sometimes a little disturbing.
I spoke to my wife and said if we stay strong together and handle this correctly then I think things will be ok. I asked her if it was just about the kids or was she really struggling. Basically she is really struggling. A final decision has not been made yet but if I were a betting girl I think this week she will ask me to move out.
Very often you will plead, from your very core of your heart, your soul, your being, and you will ask for help, and the help is being formulated and things are being put in place. And then you say, “I guess they didn’t hear me,” and you grab back the request, and you do what your will—and I am talking personality and ego—desires to direct you. And you basically cancel out the assistance that we have desired to give you.
So while we have to deal with the threat at hand from our government,
Mother: I can get it for your brother's truck, Gee (my niece) will like it.
I miss many of you. I know I've been scarce. I just had to blog about this. I'm thankful my son will extend his methadone use, for now. I can't believe I'm saying that, but his body isn't ready yet.
I’d like to start with a big thank you to everyone that reached out regarding yesterday’s post. Based on my through-the-roof blog hits, I’ve learned that people are quite interested in reading about plastic surgery, and I appreciate all the comments here, and through Facebook, Twitter, and email. If you missed the post, click here – it’s about the consultation I had with a plastic surgeon, and whether or not I’m ready (physically, mentally, and emotionally) for a tummy tuck.
by the camera crew. The camera work in general was
Four Movies You Can See Over and Over
*Mystique* Congregration, I shall have to say:
The robed figures were dispersing, some staying behind to exchange pleasantries. The manager was approaching Michal with a clipboard. “Sign and date here and here please. Terms and cons.”
Not only was he brilliant, he was handsome, with the red gold hair so prized by his race and class, and although he was on the small side, he had as well the strength and physique of an athlete, a tennis player and a fencer. He was also born into the highest levels of the English nobility, the heir to the second oldest Earldom in the nation. Had he been born in Italy he would have been regarded as a Prince, for there, unlike England, the nobility still retained complete control over their medieval demesnes, which we call principalities. His rank, although in some respects a marvelous gift, was also a curse, for although it gave him a great deal more economic freedom than most men of his age, it also tied him to a prescribed and highly restrictive role in the life of his community, a role he could escape only in the theatre or in the pages of a book; ultimately it demanded the sacrifice of his identity as a writer.
The bill broadens the scope of what falls under the rule, said Paul Hannah, an expert in media and First Amendment law who represents the Pioneer Press. “It is forward looking, irrespective of
The pain of that thought stops me, as my eyes turn to my heart. Is that what this has become for me? Familiar? I push my way to the front of the crowd, my eyes searching for His face now. Finding Him, my heart desperately whispers above the shouts of the crowd calling for His death. “Jesus! Is that what You have become to me?” The pain in my heart rushes at me all over again and my eyes spill tears as they look at His. “Is that why I’m here, back at the beginning with You? Searching for unfamiliar?”
I put it on Daffy Duck! That's right THAT Daffy duck and Porky Pig were on. You had two characters with different speech impediments. What can be better?
1/8 t garlic powder
The views from the top are beautiful and offer an amazing panoramic view of the entire valley for miles. It is easy to see why it has been used by the military since the invasion of Alexander the Great.
Here are some other recent examples:
My sister
Best Song Musically and Lyrically
be done, but
So tonight I raise a glass to Jason Hiles, thank him for the laughs and friendship, and send him into literary limbo. For now. He'll be back.
I always say my kids outfits that they pic for the first day of school & Easter
Thus we know beyond any reasonable doubt that the astrology of ancient India was extremely different than the astrology of modern India. The astrology currently practiced in India involving planets, signs and houses is not the “Vedic” astrology of ancient India. It is not the science developed by the ancient sages. Rather it is a mixture of that ancient science with similar sciences imported into India during classical times from yavanas (Greeks) and tajjikas (persians).
The vision is growing legs, and not just learning to see, but learning to walk.
It's not because I don't enjoy hearing from my multitudes of readers. I love you guys!
Jose Reyes’ return to CitiField for the first time in the 2012 season.
Hirsch suggests making a deal with Santorum: “We will stay out of his church, and he will stay out of our bedrooms.”
Are you ready? Well we have some of a bag packed and we have a car seat. I don't know if we are really READY though.
Weee (What he says when he spins in circles, lol)
Synge suffered from Hodgkins disease a form of cancer and at the time untreatable. He died just weeks short of his 38th birthday and was at the time trying to complete his last play, Deirdre of the Sorrows.
digi bunny.
First, let’s ask ourselves which of these passages are an example of an apparent conflict between the discoveries of physical science and sacred Scripture? None of them. So this is a strong indication that Bob is just tilting at windmills.
individually you have much blood on your hands – very unclean hands!
That night at supper,
Editors like clean copy because it means they don't have to do much work. Or, rather, they only have to do their own work - they don't have to do the work you should have done properly in the first place. The bottom line is that 'copy' should be as close to the text finally published as possible. Improvements the editor makes, in consultation with you, should be adding the benefit of the editor's expertise and alternative view, not fixing the things you screwed up. The editor may work hard to fix the book they have already commissioned from you - but they sure as hell won't commission another if the copy you send is a mess. Copy is not a draft. Drafts are your steps towards copy.
inevitable inward circling that draws Lisbeth into a confrontation with a corrupt father figure/abuser, and a burial alive that she improbably escapes. This second entry is certainly not faultless: there are some woefully long bows drawn in the story, it’s slow, and, like its predecessor, the visual lexicon is however not that of the cinema but television. I’m not sure if some fine exemplars of clunky dialogue, like Blomkvist’s defensive salvo at the Jewish cop Bublanski (Johan Kylén) heading the investigation targeting Lisbeth, “She hates men who hate women,” is a by-product of clumsy translation or was bad originally. The episode tosses in another of the series’ signature moments where Lisbeth, this time entirely transforming herself into a wraith of vengeance with a pancake-slathered face with one blood-red smear for extra cabalistic effect, ties up and tortures a manwhose thoughtless exploitation of women supposedly justifies Lisbeth getting her own rocks off with such behaviour, which served to not make me cheer, as is intended, but instead made me realise how narrow and contrived the series’ moral schema is. The fact that Lisbeth may be a version of what she hates isn’t an idea this series’ basic
I am, I’m simply candidly calling to ask for a contribution. As the senior member of the um, committee and a sub-committee chair, we have (chuckles) obligations to raise, uh funds. “
0/0/41 Execution/Advisory/Discretionary Was execution but fuck that shit u gots no power and kill nothing. vry misleading name, discertionary do it all
I wake at 5.45 to a spliff. Was it only yesterday that I did the same and then broke curfew with a knife in my bag? I can smell rain in the air. The rumbling of distant thunder seems like I imagine gunfire would sound. I imagine I'll soon know if that's accurate or not.
Vanna
“The Musical Depreciation Revue.”
1. San Francisco 49ers
To the lie that I’m alone.
Your weaknesses are inspirational opportunities, especially if you’re loved. For example, acknowledging your inability to create systems gives place for system builders to step up.
For prog fans grab a copy of the new Knight Area album ‘Realm Of Shadows’. If you enjoy bands like Arena, IQ and Pendragon you will enjoy this album – good use of atmospherics and keyboards throughout the album.
Poetry isn’t just something for study in English class. Whitman, Frost, and other classics are great choices for something familiar, but why not give a contemporary poet a chance, too? Trust me, he or she could probably use the royalties.
THE STORYTELLERS' COLLECTION-Tales from Home (Multnomah 2001)
Love is always worth it…because what doenst kill you
The additional pitfalls to your particular Life Path are a tendency to become overwhelmed by responsibilities and a slave to others; especially members of you own family or close friends. It’s easy for you to fall into a pattern of being too critical of others and yourself. The misuse of this Life Path produces tendencies for you to engage in exaggeration, over-expansiveness, and self-righteousness. Modesty and humility may not flow easily.
At some point you have to stop analysing your SOA and start turning the various designs and specifications you have into working services. In recent years the toolsets available to create services have been maturing very quickly indeed.
Your voice starts to have a tone, perhaps only slight, but there none the less, of pompous authority.
This was the first year for Oskar Blues to host people at the Hop Farm, and it is brand new. If Oskar Blues puts on bus tours again, I'd go again. Tickets for the all day affair were a very affordable $25. Best $25 you'll spend. *I was invited to attend as a media guest.
Other than that, just work work work. I've taken on lots of new responsibilities, and I am now in charge of corralling the personal shoppers and making sure everyone is hitting their goals. It's fun, though. I love our personal shoppers!
*Sniffle* Can someone pass me a tissue? Come over here and cradle me?
When can we see you on TV next time?
Ethics is a huge part of accounting. We all know about the Enron scandal and countless more before it: Management committed accounting fraud. So at Deloitte, we're always on the lookout for these issues, and ethics is the top issue that we must consider.
I have a special little project to share with you today. As you know, I am guest designed with Some Odd Girl for the month of February. When she offered me the GDT spot, Kristy asked me to make 1 extra special project. This got me thinking (and panicking!) right away and I started prowling around the house, looking for something to alter. Then I stumbled across a boring, black A5 folder that has been unused, gathering dust for the last couple of years. A plan was cunningly hatched.....!
In Barbara Harris’ intriguing article “Marriage: 16th Century Style” and George Frederick Nott’s “Works of Henry Howard, earl of Surrey, and of Sir Thomas Wyatt the elder”in two volumes, we see firsthand letters the Duchess composed making attempts at seeking help in vain from the Lord Privy Seal Thomas Cromwell, and even appeals to King Henry VIII himself. Ahead of her time, Duchess Elizabeth spoke out when no one else would and though it is unfortunate she was not heard, it speaks of a courage seldom seen in documented early modern history on the part of these amazing women. Sadly, we also see the reaction of her husband the Duke, not unlike reactions of many modern abusers–denial and threats should the abuse be exposed coupled with accusations of her “slander”.
...living arrangement looks something like this:
Spinning it was super easy, but there were a lot of coarse hairs to be picked out, which I did in the beginning, and eventually let some of them go.
And of course the deeper quieter revolution is tending the garden of your own thoughts. Don't let anyone sell you the used-up collateral of our hybrid F1 collective (corporate) thought-police.
One night John finds Meg on the bridge with a few of her acquaintances and her “boyfriend” Eric. He sets out to teach them about the dangers of trespassing on the train tracks by forcing them to ride along with the firemen, paramedics, or him during their spring break.
The 10-day naval exercise coincided with increased tension in Iran’s nuclear row with Western powers. Iranian state television reported Sunday that it successfully produced and tested fuel rods for its nuclear power plants.
It comes as a surprise that such a major magazine name would wade in on such a hot topic. However, the Condé Nast International chairman, Jonathan Newhouse, said on Thursday, “Vogue editors around the world want the magazines to reflect their commitment to the health of the models who appear on the pages and the well-being of their readers.”
Lee" I love this letter for several reasons. First, it introduced me to new ideas - those of T.D. Weldon and those of his critics in political philosophy.
"Mahshy" is one of the most popular main dishes in Arabic countries like Egypt and Sirya, it's also known as "Dolma". "Mahshy" is an Arabic word means "stuffed" and it's called on some leaves like (cabbage, grape leaves, lettuce leaves, or kale leaves) or some vegetables like (tomatos, eggplant, zucchini, or bell pepper) stuffed with many kinds of stuffing different from country to another or from one person to another, one of these types is rice and ground beef with some spices, or only rice with some herbs and tomato juice (Egyptian stuffing), and this one is what I'm going to use today, this dish is usually eaten with the preferred meat or chicken, I recommend chicken in the oven with potatoes, and minced onion or even without potatoes. Stuffed grape leaves is considered as an appetizer dish in some countries and restaurants. Today I'm going to make "Mahshy Kronb & Wara'a Enab" or stuffed cabbage and grape leaves, I hope you like it.
After reading reviews for both Yankee candles and Kringle candles I decided to have a look at what Kringle candles had to offer and popped over to their website www.kringlecandle.co.uk
So unemployment discrimination, as NELP calls it, could — and probably does — affect a broad spectrum of jobless workers.
With a sick toddler (and now Ben is sick, too) I am unable to go to the gym. Unless I want all the moms there to kick my ass for bringing my sick kids to the daycare there. And, they can do it, too. Trust me on this.
punkfiction- you attention loving fool. i think we have seen so many photos of your red headed children that they are all embedded in our brains. is it a necessity to change your signature every day to gain attention? does your DH not love you enough? do you enjoy using your children as models? i must ask why they are not on any tlc shows yet. we all know you are rich, as am i, but you do not have to flaunt it, my dear. show some class.
Since my childhood I've always loved rye bread in any form - and the next bread I was to bake in Peter Reinhart's The Bread Baker's Apprentice , Marbled Rye Bread looked particularly appealing to me. The picture in the book shows a lovely loaf with beautifully delineated light and very dark areas.
Within a few months, Brinsley Schwarz had come to the attention of Dave Robinson, a fledging rock & roll manager who had founded the Famepushers Agency. Robinson developed a complex scheme to elevate Brinsley Schwarz to stardom. According to his plan, the Brinsleys would play an opening set for Van Morrison at the Fillmore East in New York in the spring of 1970, and he would fly all of the leading rock journalists to America to review the show. Late in 1969, Brinsley Schwarz signed a record contract with United Artists, and the band financed the publicity stunt with its advance. The group planned to leave a few days before the show in order to rehearse, but the Brinsleys were denied visas on a technicality. They were finally given visas on the morning of the show, and arrived in New York hours before the concert. Back in Britain, the journalists ran into trouble, as their plane developed a mechanical fault, delaying the flight for four hours. When the journalists arrived at the Fillmore 18 hours later, they were either drunk or hung over. When Brinsley Schwarz finally hit the stage, the band gave a competent but underwhelming performance, setting the stage for a flood of scathing reviews for both the concert and the eponymously titled debut album, which appeared weeks after the showcase.
The idea was to plant out the majority of my tomatoes along there this year, plus some onions and herbs. Somehow, having used our own compost as well as a whole collection of organic materials, all sorts of other unplanned things have started gowing there. An elder branch and a hazel branch which were rammed into the ground to support the terraces have started sprouting. And the amongst the tomatoes all sorts of other stuff started sprouting: Yarrow
Love is in the air....okay, okay, enough of the corney lovey, dovey stuff....right?! WRONG! I'm so corney I can't go a day being normal...what's normal anyways! LOL
Nevermore the movie, The Village (2004)
I'm not so concerned about the guys, it's the lady parts that make me nervous. It's not that I'm scared of labias majora and minora, I just don't want to be too rough. Err, I don't have a lot of, let's say experience, with washing the peesh.
To improve my craft, I started taking classes at the local Writer’s Center and attending conferences. I also joined a critique group, which has been a source of helpful criticism and moral support. I received a grant from the Society of Children’s Bookwriters and Illustrators for my second novel, which inspired me to keep working. I applied for the MFA program at Hollins University because I wanted to study writing and literature more formally. I liked the program because it emphasized critical as well as creative work, and the courses were mainly held during summers, too, so the program fit my work schedule better than other MFA programs. I visited the campus before I applied and felt at home there.
that one could sigh alone
3. New York Jets
Power storage problem. Maybe solar power towers, or water pumping to store energy.
who were left stayed behind deliberately, calmly, stepping aside to let the weaker ones, those to whom they owed protection, take their way to safety.
Finding information (on any number of writing/publishing topics) isn’t overwhelmingly hard…but it’s been my experience so far that it’s hard to get the information RIGHT (see my recent post, especially the comment section, for a good illustration of what I’m talking about). It’s also very, very hard to find a way to make that information work for YOU – to get a handle on what you should discard, and what you should tweak. I definitely, definitely underestimated, going into all of this, how very blindly I’d be navigating pretty much everything in doing it alone.
She watches minutes tick by on the clock,
“To the round humans of the Island of Dee,
Interrogatory No. 4
I'm thinking that a leader like this man would certainly come in handy about now!
The Opposition leaders are hardened politicians who have served time in jail, have courted arrest many times and are willing to take greater risk to trigger mass action.
Well, as far as morbid titles go, this is surely the title winner in the life of this blog so far!
So far, Spider-Man has acclimated to being a part of our diverse animal family, as well as being a part of the family in general. He may nip a tad, but he has (yet) to actually bite us. Although, he takes pleasure in pooping on ME any time that he can get it seems. And he loves running on his wheel (hence why there is an old pillow we don’t use any longer UNDER his cage, as to stifle the horrid sounds of his use of the wheel from vibrating all the way down to my bedroom in the basement) and cuddling with us human family members.
I am going to share with you eight random things about me in hopes that you get to know me better, plus I just love being random. It must have
We were looking for food at gone 2PM and I was determined to get to the Countryman to get to taste their own brewed beer. The pub was rammed so having made sure they were open all day I suggested to my soggy companions that we should go to the Three Tuns, a Batemans pub near the church, in what was potentially the only original part of the old village we saw. As I explained to the ladies, being a Batemans pub, it was bound to do real ale and food. And it did.
and we’d play
Well today has been scientifically and mathematically calculated to be the most depressing day of the year.
Catgut – Tough string from the intestines of sheep, horses, etc. Used for surgical sutures. Also for stringing tennis rackets and musical instruments, etc. Alternatives: nylon and other synthetic fibers.
This is the state of our society today.
“I don’t think she knows any more than what we heard, but we can’t be too sure.”
In Toad the Wet Sprocket’s “Listen,” there is a line that goes, “Call you faithless…” “Faithless” is a punishing word, and like “antediluvian” not one you hear very often. It leaps out at you, an accusation, a curse.
Not the best I've had with all the Oktoberfest beer, but an excellent excursion. We made it back to the train station in Munich pretty late and things were a little off. Lots of cops and whatnot around. Anyway, I was able to score a couple nice bock beers out of the bottle at the train station. It was the best beer I had the whole trip and I did not write it down. LOST OPPORTUNITY.
Sadly the house was lost. The neighbor to the left had some roof damage and some serious water damage inside. The Red Cross stepped in and assisted with temporary housing for both families.
Round the terrific loins he seiz’d the panting, struggling womb;
If we do not wake up to the truth of political correctness, then the lies of political correctness will destroy us all, for that is what they are designed to do.
Again: you have eight days. (Although, if you're on the suspects list, you may only have two...)
Anyhow, that night I had a small fever. Thursday night I hit 102 and was having a really rough night. Friday at work, while attempting to control the fever with Tylenol and Advil, I was able to get a hold of the P.A. at Huntsman, Grace, who talked with some people and told me that if it got bad again that night to come straight in.
For this project, I broke up the features into need to haves, and want to haves, with the intention that I could call the project complete once all of the need to haves are complete. I wanted a basic engine monitoring circuit that I can put into my cars, and I have that now.
Soon, it turns out that the loft where the alleged rape took place was owned by Boyd’s business partner. Justin also admits that he had motion activated cameras set up in the bedroom and says Christine knew ahead of time that Boyd would be coming home early. Apparently Christine was having affairs with both him and Kevin. There is a tape of her and Kevin having sex (which everyone must watch for some reason), but it appears…rather enthusiastically consensual.
I adored Jamie Cat Callan's teaching method. So supportive, so insightful, so inspiring. She's so sharp, so smart and such a wonder, and I took volumes of notes and kept all of her comments on my writing.
2.This summer I started using my camera more, taking photos and experimenting with angles. This has been great fun. I tried and tried to get a shot of a butterfly with open wings and it did not happen.
And it occurred to me that Paul learned the secret of being content by walking through long and difficult seasons of discontent. In other words, the secret of contentment is intricately intertwined with discontentment. He confirms what we all already know – that contentment is for those who have fought for it. For those who have let the pressure of their external circumstances produce spiritual fruit in their internal condition.
d. Na’vi, forest
MANDATORY ENTRY !
A blend of Old Ale and Imperial IPA? Where in the Hell did they decide to come up with that? I could have sworn I had this before, but maybe I swore off Dogfish before it became widely available in Texas. Didn't know it was an IPA, at least in part, or I might not have ignored it. Then again, who knows what it will actually be, based on their penchant for mislabeling styles.
Patrick:"Like, you've been assault on him so harder his teeth fell out?"
“That’s not a turtle,” he argued. “That’s a heart.”
There are hundreds, possibly thousands, of examples of this throughout world history…and it’s wrong. In fact, it’s always been wrong.
My guess is this picture is eight years old.
And then snatch the spoon away from me and not let me eat on my own anymore.
Then she convinced me that I had a serious problem and did not in fact love her, that I didn’t even know what love was. I resisted but eventually out of love for her I believed her and tried to figure out what was wrong with me. I remember during those last 3 years I would lay in bed after hearing 5 plus hours of castigation from her and pour out my heart to God. “Please Father Please something is not right. Either I am wrong or she is. I don’t care which I don’t care if I am right or not I just want to know the truth.”
Enveloped by the atmosphere, smoke rings reach altitude,
I rather enjoyed this porter (one of my favorite styles of beer). First things I noticed with the pour was the beautiful dark brown color and the sweet chocolate aroma. The sweet chocolaty flavor was in the forefront and reminded me a little of getting a chocolate soda at the local ice cream shoppe. What surprised me was it didn't have that typical "spice" that is in the winter ales. I was dissapointed in the head on top, it wasn't that soft creamy head that I expected. But overall I will rate this beer very highly and can't wait until next Winter when it will be available again.
it created the the darkest time of my life.
A little research on The Chew website took me to Chef Symon's recipe, and so today, I'm going to give you a glimpse of what I cooked up using it, and some feedback on what I'll do differently next time.
And although I made it through the five miles, it was a pretty mentally draining feat of strength.
As a general update for those who are playing along at home:
Somewhere in the center of the forest, there is what I dub the ceremonial area. There are stone seats and stone totems. Eh…maybe this used to be a sacrificial area? Better run now!
So you may be wondering.... then WHY is this in my favourites list then? Well... I finally found a shade that I can actually pull off, albiet maybe still a tinge too light (i meant to get 128 but for some reason blurted out 127 at IMATS -- no returns -- plus I didn't realize til I got home). I like the way it looks sans photography -- it CAN be naturally, when not piled on and used in moderation with the right primer -- ie. MUFE HD Primer -- I find that it doesn't work with any other primer (for me)... I do need to set this with powder though, because regardless of it being the right shade for me now, it still leaves me kind of shiny.
A few years later I even worked as a caddy one summer, when I was thirteen (between 7th and 8th grade). It was a right of passage, as both of my older brothers caddied at Rosemont Country Club through high school. I would have kept at it, except we moved from Akron to Dallas, and the commute was hell. I did learn how awesome it was to have a sweaty wad of cash at the end of a shift, and how it was even more awesome to walk past the mall on my way home and spend all the money before it ever saw the inside of my piggy bank. Still, I had managed to save up close to a hundred bucks, mostly one-dollar bills, which made an impressive pile on my bed.
Next I must thank Hels Sheridan for the dimensional balloon idea, which I learned at her fabby workshop at the Stamp Attic a couple of weeks ago. The main balloon is also from Tim's remnants set, and the small balloon and the words are from a set by Artistic Outpost.
1 lien
Residency guidelines differ from state to state and many military dependents have found themselves battling for in-state status. Jenna notes, “Thankfully, legislation is now being passed to keep military and retiree dependents from falling through the cracks.”
with lights on...
As I wrote more and read more contemporary works, I understood that contemporary novels involve just as much effort as sf/f novels. Writing contemporary doesn't mean you've taken a step down, or digressed, in your skills. They still require world-building, for example. And I've found, as a reader, that they often have stronger characterization because there isn't a lot of "speculative candy" to distract you from the people telling the story.
Details about 14th-century birthing practices and beliefs are rendered with sharp clarity, as are those regarding food preparation, living conditions and social customs. For a time Alyce works at an inn, learning myriad ways to “economize” by cheating the customers (e.g. adding sawdust to pies and water to beer). But she finds her true calling as the apprentice to the local midwife, and one does not doubt that someday she will be a formidable one herself.
As we were rolling through the club district, we happened to spot a car in reverse backing down the street at a pretty high speed. we watch it drive backwards about three quarters of a city block to slide into a parking space, and as soon as the driver parallel parks it, I pull up next to it and block it in, hitting the lights while my partner puts the stop out over the air. As he's doing that, I get out and introduce myself to our latest customer, a black male about 35 years old who is nervous as all hell.
Spare me no thoughts
Maybe this is how it is for the those who swear by the power of Positive Thinking. It was for me a time of easy living and no cares, because, as I have said, everything worked. When it all inevitably fell apart and I lost everything I worked so hard for, the world still carried on, was still fucked up, was still in deep shit. But I hadn’t noticed that when I was carried aloft in the flow of fortune. Being given what I wanted somehow cast an impenetrable curtain before my eyes that blinded me to the disgusting, horrible shit that was going down in the world all around me. As the reversal of fortune swept me away in the other direction, I was able to the others who were being swept away along that same black tide, far, far worse off than me. The curtain that was so effective in allowing me to expect to live a happy, fulfilling life without regards to others, was beginning to come down.
Going to college? In college? Leaving college? This blog confession is for you. all of you.
MONDIAL DE LA BIERE
Some users on Apple’s Support Communities are upset over the choice of security questions that Apple is using to confirm their iTunes accounts.
My mind is blown. This is all happening so fast. Probably sounds a bit dramatic but whatev. And I’m kinda looking forward to getting to travel to NYC every now and then (or move there). Leggo.
Here is the work of today – and this is just the start:
In a show of force in support of Nintendo developed JRPG’s Nintendo fans came together to launch Operation Rainfall. OR was massive tens of thousands of Nintendo fans took part. Calling for the release of Xenoblade Chronicles, The Last Story and Pandora’s Tower. However unlike past petitions instead of signing your signature and the leaders sending them all in. Nintendo fans bombarded Twitter, Facebook and Nintendo’s representatives over the phone and email, some even resorted to snail mail. The end result was the release of XenoBlade by Nintendo themselves as well as The Last Story. With sales having exceeded 200,000 on XenoBlade, Pandora’s Tower is highly likely to follow this winter especially if The Last Story is successful. Though Nintendo themselves won’t likely publish, localize or distribute Pandora’s Tower leaving it instead to another publisher.
Brother: Mom, this kid gave me a black-eye at school.
She also cooks and has published a cookbook. I bought the cookbook a while back and have made several dishes from it. I have also made several dishes from her website. My hubby has loved each dish of hers I have made. It's simple down-home comfort food, the kind hard working cowboys eat. I am not married to a cowboy, but to a hard working southern boy who appreciates a good home-cooked meal. Ree's recipes come through every time. I post the recipes of hers that I make to Foodie Fans of the Pioneer Woman, a blog that loves Ree and her cooking.
Or at least your desert, cover-up garb.
I am one of 99% in this country without health insurance so I am trying to deal with my health issues organically through diet and vitamins. I am not quite 50 but my body has been acting as if I am older. I am amazed that I am even writing this post but it has been on my mind for a while to post an update on my journey towards self discovery and fulfillment.
Libya was also overthrown this very same day. Many people argue this was strictly a negative – an attempt by the Cabal to stop Africa’s new financial system before it started.
I really wish I would have had time to be apart of the ad club or prssa or something. I wish I wouldn’t have wasted a lot of my time working and not focusing on school and connecting with important people. I wish I would have saved a site, flyer, page, conversation, or something that I could use as an example for my 9 years of experience in the local music scene. I wish I would have saved every event page, flyer, or promotional status, blog, post, bulletin, or tweet that I posted for an example as well. Or that I was more proud of work I did my first 5 years of college.
As the redeemed of Christ we are a sweet smell in the nostrils of our God. We are the fragrance of Christ. As we proclaim the Gospel of our Lord, and stand against sin we are fulfilling the will of the Father in Christ Jesus.
And I lie down but to sleep in bed,
I came across the narrow building which had carved "POLICE STATION FIRST PRECINCT" in it over the front door and walked inside to find a little old man sitting at the front desk. He recommended I start on the third floor and work my way down. Not surprisingly, much of the museum is devoted to 9/11, but it also has an impressive collection of antiques. A back room on the third floor displayed the badge of every officer killed in the line of duty, since the first in 1853. A display case had a history of the departments most prestigious medals, including the NYPD Medal of Honor. On the other side of the floor was a number of discarded pieces from police equipment that was in the area on 9/11 -- a door from a police truck, sirens from a car, guns, hats, belts, etc., and a 60 Minutes special on how Commissioner Ray Kelly is working to turn the NYPD into a military and intelligence force comparable to the CIA and FBI was being shown. A number of photographs of the damage of that day and people being helped were shown along with a display entitled "Policing a Changed City".
I bought a little notepad calendar that is blank with peel off pages. I think I got it at Walmart or a dollar store. You can use it for any month, just write in the dates and there you go. That’s my “scratch pad”. I sit down with my day timer and see what we have going on in the coming weeks, and note it on the scratch pad after I’ve filled in the dates. Then I take the previous months plan which is on the white board calendar on my fridge, and see what worked, what didn’t etc and start writing in meal ideas. I also have a list stuck to the side of the fridge that has a list of all the dinner ideas that have been a hit. I have it categorized by meat type, soups and “other” for things like pasta or dishes that don’t fit into the other categories. I refer to this if I’m having a hard time thinking of ideas. I also look at cookbooks where I might have flagged a page. I think about things like what meals are inexpensive, time consuming etc and plan accordingly based on what’s going on. After I’m happy with the scratch pad version I transfer it to the white board calendar on the fridge. Then, all I have to do is look at it during one of my daily passes and can immediately pull anything out of the freezer that I need that night.
This is a good one!
Dr. Buckman also worked at London’s Chelsea Clinic, often times treating adults and sometimes children. Buckman believed strongly that “frigidity” in women could be treated successfully with LSD. In 1967, he said of LSD: “Many therapists believe that a transcendental experience – a feeling that it is a good world and one is a part of it – is a curative experience in itself.” According to several informed sources in the London, for years MI6, the British intelligence service and the CIA closely monitored the LSD work conducted by Sandison, Ling and Buckman.
We've been really productive around our house lately.
Mercury stations direct on Sunday, September 12, though it will not move fully out of its retrograde shadow until September 27. We can begin now to move back into “middle world reality,” balancing our new intuitive skills with our logical, rational intellect, which is a very valuable ally in helping us move toward the goals our intuition guides us to discover and refine.
The sweetest place is bursting at the seams in Tyler Texas! I have heard of it but have never witnessed it until now, when Holly emailed me, I need 5000 more liners, no 100,000, no 200,000!!! We have been crazily wrapping and boxing and shipping overnight, one day express you name it Holly loves our liners and we love Holly!
Tomato - 2 medium chopped
Etude House BB Magic Cream
I am entering these into a few challenges so I can share her work with others
10am-5pm Saturday & Sunday we teach you approx 15 different cards all with rubber stamps. We use lots of different accessories and techniques and have lots of fun.
2. Lack of Ideas. Johnson’s only real electoral rival is Ken Livingstone, back in the Labour Party fold since January 2004 having won his first of two terms (2000-2004) as a maverick candidate outside the scope of a party machine. Staring at his campaign pamphlets, we wondered to ourselves: is this really the same man who once introduced visionary policies on transportation and air quality? The basic thrust of Livingstone’s campaign appears to be a series of virtually inconsequential financial subsidies: a 7% public transport fares reduction in a settlement where the price of a single bus journey starts at £1.30 is hardly pulsating; the restoration of a £30/week education grant, while welcome, is far from material.
It’s one of the drawbacks of being famous that people often stop me in the street and demand to know what I think about stripping as a career. ‘I lack the flexibility,’ I reply, though in truth, I encourage all men to take off their clothes for money unless they suffer some obvious physical defect such as good looks or a perfect body. It’s why I could never make a career as ‘Big Dick Madeley’. The Great Sculptor damned me by using clay free of blemishes. There’s not a wart on my body; just shapely legs, firm buttocks, and a thin waste angling nicely into armpits to die for. And as Chip proves, to be a male stripper, you have to put all your obvious flaws on show. It’s what makes for a rowdy evening and Judy return home at four thirty in the morning threatening me with a thong slingshot.
Not rated; I'd approximate it as between a PG-13 and R. (A captivating and heartwarming story. I highly recommend watching it. Starring Alan Rickman and Sigourney Weaver.)
last 0.4 at 9:50
Seldom do you see
- Make a cash donation (stop in the day of the sale or see a director any time).
The ending stops right before the protag is to make an important decision. He's at a crossroads really. Nik Korpon stops the story at the perfect place because either option seems like one that the protag would make and the reader ultimately pushes him in one direction or the other.
An “existing home” is a home that’s been previously occupied or owned.
A dumpster is a steel container that is used for waste disposal and designed in such a way that it allows the emptying of the waste into garbage trucks. A roll off on the other hand is basically a dumpster with an open top, and as the name suggests, has wheels that enable rolling it in place. It is usually larger than a normal dumpster. Therefore, a roll off dumpster is one that encompasses both the two definitions. There are companies that have specialized the in the business of offering rental services for these dumpsters. One should therefore consider some facts before choosing the company that will offer them the best rental deal for their money.
Now, the most oft-quoted tradition supporting women praying at home states, “It is more excellent for a woman to pray in her house than in her courtyard, and more excellent for her to pray in her private chamber than in her house” (Abu Dawood, al-Tirmidhi). In context, this saying was related to the people after the Prophet had announced that men gain more reward when they pray in congregation at the mosque. Nonplussed by this announcement, a woman approached him and said, “but I’m at home with the kids and the housework. I can’t get to the mosque — that’s not very fair is it?” The Prophet agreed, but explained it in terms of a woman’s responsibility in the private sphere: In context, the tradition is saying that while men get more reward by going to the mosque, women who have responsibilities at home get the same reward when they pray at home.
The last time we really spent much time with her and my uncle was before we moved to Korea (I was 12, to give some perspective). We visited briefly when we came back three years later, but since they live way up in NY, we just… never really made it back.
I stepped on a piece of glass and cut my foot. Frankie helped me out of the stall. Just then the bathroom door opened up.
At least she keeps her clothes on. Not all literary agencies who use a sex doll as their spokesperson--uh--spokesdoll--uh--whatever--are so considerate!
Ronald Reagan Park, Temecula
Before leaving the house I was trying to recall the name of the pub in Higham. According to the Internet it was the Greyhound - I knew it wasn't, because there are two, and it aint that one! The Internet, where everything is true, then told me it was called the Three Horseshoes. So this is all I had, along with a half remembered mental picture of the pub being near the cross. The Red Arrow follows the main road which passes the Greyhound, but then bypasses the old village centre. My only gripe about the Red Arrow is that its coaches don't seem to have a bell - anyone getting off thus far had just got up and announced their desire to disembark. I did this at seeing the Greyhound, and then waited 5 minutes for the bus to set off a goodly distance round the corner away from Higham village.
9:00 a.m. - 12:00 noon
Have a look and see for yourself.
Computer Printed Sentiment
Tonight, I broke the gym-skipping streak by doing what was scheduled for today-35 minutes of XT. Today, it came in the form of 20 minutes on the elliptical and 15 on the bike.
Okay, so Cylinder has an admittedly simple premise. But where it excels is in its EXECUTION.
My new book blogger friend Helen had left a message, saying, "I have an award for you." Ha! My sunny day continues, right up until dark. Helen presented me with the Sunshine Award. Thanks, Helen! I'm tired in a good kind of way this evening, but totally ready to climb into bed and read before sleep. All of you dear readers who have gotten this far should consider yourselves recipients of this award -- from me to you, and you, and you. Good night, sun. Good night, moon. Good night, friends.
After inquiring for more details about Aashika’s various projects, I learned that Aashika had started her own on-campus student group, called “Stop the Traffick,” at UC Berkeley. But after exploring on-campus student organizations and working for various NGOs after graduating from UC Berkeley, Aashika says she found it “difficult to experiment and pilot my own ideas, prompting me to start my own non-profit. It was risky, but the only way to find out if something can work is to try!” With this spirit, she decided to start her own non-profit and partnered with other, like-minded NGOs who also want to be more proactive in stopping and preventing human trafficking.
* You have mentored asylum seekers and refugees and you’re married into an Iraqi family. Did any true life stories or people help inspire your writing of Hidden?
Other - Gemstone embellishemnt, Prima flowers, Pearl Flower centers, AC Thickers
"All your possessions will be confiscated, and, by the permission of this honorable meeting, will be used in my projects of infrastructure. Your shop will be converted into a clinic to provide real and genuine help to those suffering from excessive drinking...."
I am not using this section of scripture to compare any situation including the man who killed Tiller. I am using it to demonstrate that God has at times used men to accomplish His purpose and to illustrate Biblical example of an attribute of God that we are afraid to look at some times. Just note that this man was used as a “deliverer.”
For the uninitiated, the Lido de Paris is a world famous cabaret venue on the Champs Elysées. It also happens to be where my lovely wife high-kicks her heart out each night for a living (two shows a night, six nights a week ... count 'em).
Happy weekend to all of you and enjoy your May!
--1--
All that follows is true, I swear…
Few authors know how to breed chaos through words, but such matters are a cakewalk for Chuck Palahniuk, whose debut novel Fight Club is the epitome of modern disorder. Furthermore, even fewer authors incorporate a writing style as original and recognisable as Palahniuk’s, who clearly stands out from the crowd as early as with his very first published work.
I didn't get it, being only seven years old. But she was a big baby, just shy of ten pounds. When my mama returned from the hospital one grey afternoon, I remember running alongside our yellow Datsun as they slowly drove through the driveway to the back of the house. My cousins ran alongside me. We were excited.
As with any goal, if the attitude and determination are aligned, success is inevitable. It may not be as timely as we hoped, but it will happen.
(If you have more buttonhole attachment lore to share, please do.)
is...about waking up in the middle of the night, but not fully awake... forgetting where he is and
- Murder suspect Ramona Bautista’s flight to Turkey after being implicated in the murder of her brother
As for the military and police, you can expect high numbers of deserters, placing an even greater strain on the limited resources of government order. This is not meant as an insult to our uniformed personnel, but from my personal experience of being a New Orleans police officer before, during and after Hurricane Katrina, I witnessed 1/5 of the police department simply walk away the first day. Some chose to leave for family reasons while others left due to stress. I also saw how quickly those we entrust with public safety can become an armed street gang and simply take what you have at gun point. These are all valid topics to consider when speaking about an event such as an EMP or severe solar storm. These are valid points even when the disaster is very localized, such as Hurricane Katrina was.
Yet the great joy when the same followers of Jesus at a later stage found his grave empty and an angel said to them: "Do not be afraid, for I know that you are looking for Jesus who was crucified. He is not here: He has risen, just as He said". Over a period of forty days Jesus himself then appeared to his followers, when He, before his ascencion, promised them that the Holy Spirit would come and gave them a commandment to go and make disciples of all nations and to baptize them. Whoever believes and is babtized will be saved, but whoever does not accept the message will be condemned.
The part of the Indian Ocean in which this earthquake occurred has two very different types of geologic structure very close to each other; there is the Ninetyeast ridge – a volcanically produced range, and a destructive margin subducting the Indian plate eastwards under the Pacific margin. It is important to note (in the context of this earthquake at least) that the sea floor under the Ninetyeast ridge was originally produced by standard constructive margin seafloor spreading.
My kids get it better than most.
Ooops, so sorry...I made my post but don't think I 'scheduled' it correctly so it did not post on Wednesday...yikes...here it is!
Our minds, ie: thoughts and attitudes will control HOW we feel.
(Someone tell me why a video someone uploaded of the homer to youtube has been taken down due to copywright laws, when the b mac grand slam has not?)
(Ezek 34:4 KJV) The diseased have ye not strengthened, neither have ye healed that which was sick, neither have ye bound up that which was broken, neither have ye brought again that which was driven away, neither have ye sought that which was lost; but with force and with cruelty have ye ruled them.
So you have to learn to manage your time and be good at a little bit of everything. But don’t worry — we teach you how to do this!
6) A Wardrobe Blast From the Decadent Past - Now of course any film set in the time period of Boogie Nights is bound to showcase a kick-ass wardrobe, but the outlandish sensibilities of PTA's film make it even more kick-ass than expected. Of course being set in the porn industry doesn't hurt either. From Rollergirl's knee-high tube socks and hot pants to Dirk Diggler, Reed Rothchild and Buck Swope's array of disco-era fashion, there is no doubt the wardrobe department had one hell of a good time coming up with how to dress their cast.
-Rehearsal dinner band: Band of Oz- they still talk about our party to this day it was so much fun
It’s just a decision.
The auction ended this morning and the biggest highlight of the unclaimed property auction was the 1 carat diamond ring.
Whitechapel, November 1888: Jack the Ripper is committing his last known act of butchery in the one-room hovel occupied by the luckless harlot, Mary Kelly. And beneath the bed on which the fiend is cruelly and cheerfully eviscerating his victim cowers a fifteen-year-old boy….This is just the start of the extraordinary adventures of Trevor Bentley, a boy who embarked on an errand of mercy and ran into the most notorious serial killer in criminal history, a boy who became a man as he travelled on a quest of vengeance across a wild and untamed continent–a boy who brought the horrors of Jack the Ripper to the New World.”–taken from back cover
Garrett's mom sent him home with some awesome cookbooks the other day, so I spent the time looking up things I'd love to make once the power is back on. These are the Best of Bridge books, which I coincidentally gave to my mother for Christmas a few years ago and my family loves them.
Here are lines from a few songs that also came to mind:
If you happen to be one of the aforementioned LAMB compatriots, and therefore eligible to vote, you can do so at the 2012 LAMMY voting booth. Perhaps during your perusal of the categories you could throw this old salt a bone or two of a vote, but only if you think I am deserving - or maybe even if you don't. Now as anyone who collects comics or trading cards or anything of that ilk knows, there are always bound to be some variant editions. Below are your very own collector's item variant FYC ads. Enjoy. And remember to vote vote vote. And in all sincerity (see, I can do more than just snarky), good luck to all my fellow LAMBs.
...oh, and let's not forget Markus' dad Alexander, or Sascha, as he's also known. If a main character has to be chosen it would be Alexander, as one of the main strands, set in 2001, follows him on his travels in Mexico, attempting to come to terms with a cancer diagnosis. Then again, as he is mainly absent during the other two strands (one describing the events of a party on the first of October 1989, the other starting in 1952 and ending in 1995), he might not be such a good choice for a central character after all...
When I am pregnant I add in a few extra things to my diet. Spirulina, Floradix and if being more vigilant about drinking water.
Luckily there are more than a few saving grace elements at work here: Sanders' old butler makes the youth-age divide less a factor in who's cool vs. uncool, since even at 64--slurring from his debilitating stroke and deeply depressed--he's still twice the badass of any of these young 'Living Dead' louts. Sanders was so badass in fact he actually committed suicide a year after finishing the film. That's meta, baby, meta. And he left the second best note in all of Hollywood:
I printed it out and decided to make a batch and hope for the best. I must say, the dough was the most difficult dough I've ever worked with - but the reward for my tenacity really paid off. I have a tasty batch of gingerbread cookies, soft enough to make me happy, deliciously spicy, and firm enough to stand up to decorating with royal icing. I'm a happy camper!
1. The 'Dream Lord' is rumoured to pretend to be the Doctor because of a shot of him inside the TARDIS wearing the Eleventh Doctor's costume in the trailer.
-Why Obama needs to abandon his natural state of reasoned debate, as no one’s paying attention to sane dialog. Instead he must change his tactic to lay out his vision in overly simplistic terms while doggedly attacking Republicans. The question becomes whether or not he has the temperament to do so.
I hope all of you are having a good summer and not letting the August doldrums get you down.
another frame project that i'm itching to try is a framed monogram first spied from megan at HONEY WE'RE HOME. she created it by using a patterned scrapbook paper as the background, colored paper for the cut-out letters, scrapbook tapes and any frame you may not use at home. it looks like a million bucks - i love it!
You have surely seen the impressive side by side comparisons between standard televisions and high definition ones. So you might find yourself entertaining the idea of upgrading, and now is easier to do this than it ever has been. I would urge you to start your search with Sony. They have been a first rate company for most high tech devices, and high definition televisions are no exceptions. Simply go into your favorite search engine and type in “Sony KDL32V5810″.
The court applied its standard Section 2(a) test, requiring that the PTO prove: (1) that the mark is the same as, or a close approximation of, the name or identity previously used by another person or institution; (2) the mark would be recognized as such, in that it points uniquely and unmistakably to that person or institution; (3) the person or institution named by the mark is not connected with the activities performed by applicant under the mark; and (4) the fame or reputation of the person or institution is such that, when the mark is used with the applicant's goods or services, a connection with the person or institution would be presumed.
On our way there, I asked for and received an overview of what his gym had to offer. As he described the “cardio” room, I suddenly realized that the place we were headed had to be mammoth. As we pulled into the parking lot, it was obvious that my calculations were in fact correct… the place was huge from the outside. We made our way inside to the “check in” desk where we were greeted by a handsome, 20-something, young man who obviously maintained his own fitness by the looks of him. Realizing we had left our identification in the car, I quickly rushed back outside in the annoying misty rain to get our state issued identification (something we’d never need at our own place of working out). We filled out the required information sheet and liability waiver and were now free to enter the gym.
I think it's time that this book be reprinted. It should be more accessible than it is, and in today's world of self-publishing in which anyone can produce high-quality, attractive books, this book is definitely a candidate. Besides, it needs a new cover.
Lots of brides and grooms who choose traditional classical music for most of their ceremony -- the prelude and processional music -- switch to a rock'n'roll, R&B, or pop song for their recessional. The recessional, of course, is the song played just after the officiant pronounces you husband and wife, and you walk together back up the aisle, away from the altar.
Thomas said to him, “Master, we do not know where you are going; how can we know the way?”
Add wet to the dry mix, stir well.
“…Chairman of the nation’s peak trucking body, the Australian Trucking Association, David Simon said larger companies were increasingly demanding longer periods until they began paying their road transporters and this was hitting truckers hard.
I knew this morning would come.
Elizabeth: When I’m on a roll, I write every day. I’m a morning person and basically roll out of bed and write until noon. I find I get my best ideas in the morning.
“Errr...yeah.” Geoff said. Shaking his head and snapping back into reality properly he continued “Yeah I know where it is, thank you very much.”
First up, some background. Rothamsted Research is one of the world’s oldest agricultural research stations. They have four main areas of research, one of which is “20:20 Wheat” aka how to increase wheat productivity to yield 20 tonnes per hectare in 20 years (compared to a maximum right now of about 10t/ha). This is really important, because the UK is one of the world’s lead producers of wheat (in that we’re very good at producing high yielding fields, even if we don’t have many of those fields) and the world as a whole is currently miles away from reaching our target of doubling food production by 2050.
Applications need to be submitted online by 31 July 2012 and applicants will receive a decision by October 2012.
“If you would stop contorting your arm so weirdly when I ask you to attack a minion, maybe it would be easier…” Jagred sighed.
Edited by Jason King and Jeremy Quinn is a thrice a year kind of affair that mixes poetry, visual poetry, flash fiction and not quote so flash but still very short fiction with a few pieces of photography and artwork thrown into each edition for good measure.
Without danger or fear at the dawn of the day.
But back to the cheese. If you attended the last beer & cheese pairing we did last year, then you have been anxiously awaiting the next one. Well here it comes, Saturday, July 9th at The Fred Bar. Last year's event featured some of the best American craft beers we could find, paired with a selection of cheeses from around the country and the world. To outdo that performance, we had to come up with something really special. So this time around we are offering the following beers:
That may be so, but there is no low-rise residential neighborhood directly bordering the Verizon Center. On one side, it is bordered by a mixed-use retail/entertainment/residential development; on the other three are much wider streets than Edison Place or even Dean Street. And the ESDC did not mention whether each location was equally equipped to guard against security threats.
Cheryl Cole made her appearance at the Pride Of Britain’s Award at London’s Grosvenor House Hotel wearing a dusky pink gown designed by Victoria Beckham.
Many of us deny what life is really meant to be, and try to make it as what we intend it to be,
Of course, it never is just about ‘Me’. But it’s easy to think it is – to think that our lives are disconnected and therefore have little effect on others. But knowing that a family depends on you shifts the focus. Fear, doubt, pride and small-minded ego just become insignificant. The choices I make, the actions I take, or don’t, now have even more direct consequences. So the focus is on the way forward, rather than the mental road blocks.
Okay bloggy friends...it's time. I've decided to join the ranks at Wordpress.com. I just get really frustrated with blogspot. It's slow and my page...like others I've seen on blogspot...is reallyyyy slow. It scrolls slow, loads slow...etc. Drives me nuts.
There's just enough snow on the ground to make it beautiful but not enough to cause traffic issues...
46 on my first Chem test this semester and 44 hours a week work isn't helping either. Going to try and keep up to date with the blog because it helps to preserve what little sanity I have left.
"Define Canada
This week, there will be more grilled cheese recipes to share from the 1840 Farm kitchen. I don’t know if any of my recipes will garner attention from the contest judges. I’m content knowing that my two favorite food critics declared this one a winner.
I’ve tried to pick pretty recognizable fairy tale characters and illustrate a moment of their story. (NOT the Disney version.) I’m doing some new shots this afternoon and some re-takes.
The day that we as adults just wish would pass us by like any other day.
Making: Intentions
Your Weekly Writing Exercise
It has been an emotional roller coaster. I’m not sure if people think I’m nutty or not – and frankly, I really don’t give a rat’s ass what people think – but my way of dealing with what may be coming down the pike is to look at everything from every angle I can possibly think of. I analyze and then analyze again. And, just for good measure, I rethink it a few more times. I have to run the “numbers” in every way possible so I don’t overlook anything that I could have done or done differently. It helps me keep my sanity (wait… I know – I have to have sanity before I can keep it, but I can pretend that I have sanity, right? Hehe!).
You bet your ass I wouldn't go to Twitter.
My back is so out of whack its crazy. I have chronic back pain, 1984 I was in a major car accident and ever since I have lived with chronic pain. I do have the good stuff for pain control, but I usually use the 800mg Ibuprofen. But today that is not helping at all. Last night it hurt like hell. But, I did the laundry and vacuumed the house(love dogs, I really do but....hair.). So tonight I just have to cook dinner and feed the birds (I have an aviary in my back yard of cockatiels). Then that is it. I am going to take a flexeril and see if that helps, maybe a hot cup of tea. Stress seems to send it into a scale of 10 for pain. Work has been stressful to say the least. The cost of gas is murder. But, I do have a job and I really do love it. But, it can be stressful. I just cant get comfortable today tho!
ALI DOUGAL, Commissioning Editor for Fiction, studied English for her first degree, prior to undertaking a postgraduate degree in publishing at Oxford Brookes University. She seemed to have always known that she wanted to be in publishing one day, and started her career with Penguin. Over time, she realized that it was children’s fiction that she really wanted to be in, and successfully made the transition into this particular area of the market, inevitably ending up at Egmont UK, the biggest children's book publisher in the UK. Does she write herself? No. It is an ambition, though she believes she may be better in editing than writing.
Intolerance leads lonely lives.
significant part the lowly pickle jar had played in my
Denise sent me the beautiful stitchery in the first picture. The post office managed to break the glass into pieces, even though it was thoroughly wrapped and packed. I will make a trip to Home Depot to get a replacement piece. I already have a spot picked out for it to hang. And if the stitchery wasn't enough Denise also sent me that cute little sheepie. He is too cute. Now the hubby has to make me another peg rack! LOL! Love making some more work for him to do! Heehee!
Recently, I’ve been seeing a lot of my blogging buddies posting WIAW posts, and I had no idea what that meant. (Yes, maybe I’ve been living under a rock (or a pile of papers that need grading)). What I Ate Wednesday is a fun weekly post/blog social event started over at Peas and Crayons. Since I’m always looking for new, healthy meal ideas, I thought I’d participate. The hardest part of the whole thing for me was remembering to take photos of my food.
Just a reminder that I am now posting on our new family blog. I want to keep this space a special place just for Ethan and Alexis. So check us out for all things Mishler! (especially for Isaac updates) The new site link is here. Our Family Blog
-introduce yourself.
… That’s all that really matters..
4. John Steinbeck’s Grapes of Wrath
I have not been.
"You could write about the squirrels." (Been there. Done that. Yesterday.)
8. We Will
Set on a residential street the unsuspecting could wander in thinking it was your bog standard Gastro Pub, though here you will not find the standard fare. We find English and Meister at the bar and take it in turns to ponder the menu. Much scratching of heads and stroking of imaginery beards ensues. We are still deciding well after being seated.
A year ago I was dedicated to getting outside a minimum of two times a week to go hiking, snowshoeing, skiing, biking, canoeing… anything really, to get out in my beautiful “back yard” here in Southeast Alaska.
AFSI has been reporting on the Israeli Destructo squads continue their dirty work undeterred by logic and common sense. Wouldn't it seem natural to suspend all demolition orders while Israel's citizens are under rocket attack from Gaza, and the threat of rocket attack from the north? These matters seem to be unrelated. The demolitions continue regardless of the fact that they ignore the realities on the ground.
4And I saw thrones, and they sat upon them, and judgment was given unto them: and I saw the souls of them that were beheaded for the witness of Jesus, and for the word of God, and which had not worshipped the beast, neither his image, neither had received his mark upon their foreheads, or in their hands; and they lived and reigned with Christ a thousand years.
I am absolutely in love with Wild Orchid Crafts flowers.. I use them on almost every project I make..
Here goes!
Aleigha was born just a year after her brother. There was simply not enough food. And, not enough food equals not enough breast milk for a mother to feed two children. My heart breaks just thinking about it.
A group of people running to catch a train all trailing large suitcases behind them
In time, once he finishes his PhD dissertation in a couple of months, I will persuade Uncle Junkal's player to write a guest post about how he came up with the juggler-as-PC concept. For now, you'll have to make do with my take on the Arandish 2d6 Jongleur for Labyrinth Lord.
'Lacks imagination'.
Well we have gone chicken mad here since my last post!
So, with Spain today, we have a totally unregulated banking system sitting atop HALF of ALL Spanish mortgages after a housing bubble that makes the one that happened in the US look like a small bump.
In the Tang dynasty (618 AD – 907 AD), tea leaves were steamed, pressed into brick form and let dry for easy storage. Brick tea was spread to Japan during this time by Buddhist monks. In modern times, only certain Pu-erh tea is processed using this method. During the Song dynasty (920 AD – 1279 AD), the Chinese started to process tea leaves in loose form as it is considered a better way to store refined tea leaves. Even to this day, loose form is still the preferred way of processing tea throughout the world.
that melted your momma's heart
It may not last night.
Sherry Guided us through the basic construction of the Dolls Body and the face up..Jean Taught us the cage .. The cage is totaly encrusted in Glitter and sparkle !! (glitter does not photograph well) .. I love the way she came out .. I still haven't given her a name
He is officially off the market. Betrothed to a 3 year old who never left his side while in MD.
When: Friday 17 February 2012, 5.30pm
And, with that, she squished the platypus and the pie shell into a ball,
I hope to continue to post all the creations I make as I play with my new products. Susan....thanks for the encouragement....hope you like the cards!
In addition to allegedly serving as a forest plantation for Taib, the dam itself was part of a grandiose plan to meet electricity demand in peninsular Malaysia, nearly 700km away, via a high voltage direct current cable, since the entire island of Borneo, where the dam is situated, including the Indonesian state of Kalimantan, is unlikely to be able to use the amount of electricity it was projected to produce in the foreseeable future.
90. Pieces of Us Margie Gelbwasser
2) Paste the award on your blog
I've had the best time working on three, well four, projects lately. I'm designing a a little boy's room, consulting on a kitchen facelift, working on inventory for a little vintage/upcycling venture with my neighbor, and gathering ideas for an upcoming photo shoot which I've been asked to style!
Josie was more a character that I was intrigued with more than could relate with. However, we have one thing in commen: she has an annoying twin. I liked her (Gasp! Chloe actually read a book with characters she liked!), she was strong and she had a great personality. (I hesitate to say evil because I am the evil twin) Alfie was a fantatsic character, much more likeable than Josie. He was hilarious and has a brilliant, albeit a little morbid, ability. The other characters, through all of their deciets and secrets, made up a huge part of the plot, springing lots of twists that came out of no where on you.
"I locked my keys in there. Thank god for sunroofs!". When she said that I heard something totally different. I heard:
are the
My personal favourite short story is ‘The Power of Words’ and I adore the way in which Monzó tells such a rich tale about one small topic whilst also including a great range of detail and characterisation. The blurb of the book sums it up brilliantly: ‘All the heroes of this short story collection are faced with a world where time and space move in circles and language has become meaningless’. The clever techniques used within and throughout Guadalajara create almost a paradox, an oxymoron, where stories and situations become simply complex.
- Life isn't always fair;
Mike Cangi: 215-642-0693
And that, ladies and gents, is how we managed to have ANOTHER ER visit unrelated to CF. Seriously, can't they come up with a frequent visitor program? Especially for parents of wild 2-year old boys.
We finish up today with Gibbon’s description of Constantinople, and start an overview of later (300′s, 400′s) Roman imperial government offices/structures.
Framed. Commando 521, Jan 1971, art by Victor de la Fuente.
Emotionally it had me. I knew going in I would probably cry like a baby in some parts. I did. Most of the theatre did too. I won’t give out spoilers in case some of you have lived under a rock and haven’t read this yet. Those who have you know what scene I’m talking about the most. Yep lots of sniffling to be had. I really felt for the characters, well the non evil ones anyways and those I just couldn’t wait until they got what was coming (then I giggled). Oh and a side note that gets this movie extra points it made me jump. Something happened and I for once wasn’t expecting it and I jumped slightly, not out of my seat or scream like some of the others but jerk back in my seat yes.
As journeys must, if they are not like some, which conclude too soon.
5. Whether you’re writing or GMing a game this is an important one to learn. You’re not telling a story, you’re facilitating the creation of good stories. Don’t be a frustrated writer, work that out in WRITING. Be a fulfilled game creator.
What do you think are the main challenges that face up-and-coming record labels today?
Overall, juvenile crime trends in Texas are quite encouraging. But unfortunately good news on crime doesn't sell papers, hence the media focus on the single Harris County category with a worse outcome.
A spokesman for the campaign said: ‘The Bill will open the way to ending libel tourism and protecting free expression for journalists, writers, bloggers and scientists around the world.
Was a phone unmber on the stairs
These guys (who will be wrapped up in cellophane) will grace each place at the table, and I’m guessing they won’t last until after the meal.
This takes us back to Duchamps folly. This argument is that because he placed it in a gallery it became art. To say something like Damian Hirst's pickled shark is important is pretentious. It is supposed to make us think but by taking the shark out of context (the sea) it is rendered meaningless because it is deprived of its being which is its life, and its function to swim and hunt. It habitat and how it lives in are essential not extraneous. A graffito by Banksy is not it is added to the environment not part of it.
New York City, San Francisco, & San Diego.
Your voice that rings in my ears to the point where I’m tired of it
Supported protocols: HTTP, WAP, JavaScript
by Sammie L. Carter copyright 4/01/2012 07:15 am
Premier Alison Redford said her government is staying out of the homes of Albertans to allow home-schoolers to teach their children their own views about morality, ethics and religion.
Michael Gass
-JUST IN CASE and WHAT I WAS by Meg Rosoff -- the fact that the author is female does not, in my opinion, negate the fact that these are books about boys. Rosoff's lovely style will be a plus for literary readers
Now, that’s a lot to digest, because it would appear that Conte has indeed made an attempt to do what I had suggested – work with the acronyms (USADA, WADA, et al) to improve the state of drug testing within the sport.
Located on the face, neck, arms and hands
USA (New York) 1:30 p.m. 17th Mar- 1:30 p.m. 18th Mar
I wanted more
On the back side there's also some space for some nice words.
An envelope of a shape you like.
You would be surprised at how many times we are asked this and by who. Friends,family members,complete strangers. You do realize that this is my child right? She isn't a lame dog I decided to go ahead and keep. She is my heart, my soul and my every breath. Just as your child is yours. Think about how crazily protective you are when your child is hurt or helpless. That is my child's reality. Do not mess with me. For the mothers that ask their own daughters this question about their daughters and grandchildren. Shame on you. You can ask things like...."Are her friends really helpful.?" Wonderful way to get your nosy, uneducated, question asked without you sounding like an insensitive ass.
Take the cubed zucchini pieces in a bowl,add the red chilly powder,amchur powder,grounded mustard-fenugreek powder,salt and mix it with a wooden spoon..
After the pineapple tarts are wrapped and rolled up, place them into paper casing (you can bake them on baking paper as well to save on the casing).... As this paper casing was bought sometime back, and taking into consideration the size, this was the reason why i used 1/2 tsp to measure the pastry dough and paste... You can make it bigger if you want, i.e. 1 tsp?
I want you to see it as poetry, which it is.
1408 D-I/20(A)/2002. “Seth G. Benardete (1930-2001).” Prelude, Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Motley shingles of grey adorned Grandpa’s house,
The next morning I’m a little better again, but Libriumia has relapsed. She has also had a spider bite on her hand, and three fingers have blown up like balloons. We get the doctor out. She says we are probably run down. She sends off some samples as well. Keep going is her only advice. At least the baby seems OK, but she is so skinny, and I still feel I’m having to force down the feeds.
Still, if you want to give your pops some fiction for Father's Day, here are few ideas that won't make him wonder what exactly you are in therapy for:
While it may take a leap of faith for many readers of this blog to believe that the Greater Hyannis Civic Association might actually be able to deliver on the promise of cleaning up the neighborhoods of Hyannis, I plan to give them the benefit of the doubt. More, I'm going to try to help them pull this one out of the hat.
Memorising the Quran is a terribly ineffective way of understanding it for those of us from non-Arabic-speaking backgrounds (and yet this is something we still push for in S’pore), but even for those who do speak it, the Quran is not written in everyday language. It’s like tackling Shakespeare or the King James Bible. It’ll sound pretty when you recite it and you might be able to appreciate the lyricism, but less so the nuances and shades of meaning. Which is what you’re in to learn! Memorising the Quran – becoming a hafiz(ah) – is a major religious accomplishment and I have no issues with it being recognised as such, but we need to stop pretending that this immediately blesses us with true understanding.
If you know someone who has an STI, especially an incurable one, who does not tell his partners about it before sexual activity (if ever), would you warn that potential partner about not only the STI but also on the lack of trustworthiness and integrity of that person?
we were elated.
For kicks- let's recap with photos via Instagram (follow me! my username is nicoledawson, or Nicole Dawson. I forget which one :) )
Halle Shifters starts with Bear Necessities and is a spin off on the Halle Puma series. I love these shifter books. She is second after Shelly Laurenston for me.
... if this is what happens, the GOP pretty much has to do a major reassessment. They will have to figure out a way to win back constituencies. My prediction is that their two biggest obstacles to regaining viability as a national party will be Latino voters and suburban women. They will have give up being the party of angry white men and make some kind of deal on comprehensive immigration reform. And they are going to have to stop these incredibly aggressive attacks on abortion rights and women's health. If they don't, they simply will not win the presidency ever again.
I agree with much but not all of Albert’s take. He starts by deconstructing Dawkins’s comparison of Krauss’s book to Darwin’s:
If you like that, you’ll love these:
I know that many of you out there enjoy owning vintage ballet slippers. This post might give you ideas for what you can do to spice yours up a bit.
I haven’t made a Christmas cake for the last couple of years. We both love it and we always used a Delia Smith recipe, which we really used to enjoy making. (Licking the bowl was the best part.)
7. How do you like to spend your days (you know after you've played with makeup xD)
I was thinking that had my father still been alive today, he would be 91 years old. My mother is at the threshold of turning 80. Yes, eleven years' difference between the two of them and it was never such an issue, as far as I could see.
We were welcomed home to severe weather. A few friends and some family met us at the airport. Only one of my three bags made it and it didn't even bother me. I was so tired and just wanted to get home to my bed. I forgot to even tell the airline the bags didn't make it. Fortunately, I have a great husband who took care of all that the next day and made my bags magically appear.
Whisk the egg whites to stiff peaks in a bowl with an electric whisk.
For more info and bio on Underworld head to:
Where's your favorite place to donate clothing?
One of Geej's favorite teachers is going to babysit for her tomorrow night so my mother and I can go out for a celebratory dinner somewhere really nice. I'll be lucky if I don't fall face down in my plate of food from the sheer exhaustion of it all.
I had been assigned to help them build a fire. Just as my leaders had done, I had each girl tie her hair back from her face before we began. The next step was to get a big bucket of water. I asked one of the girls to go and fill it, while I was showing others how to arrange rocks around the fire pit. After a few minutes, I realized I wasn’t hearing any water going into the metal bucket. I turned around, and there was the girl, holding the bucket, but making no progress. I asked again. She moved toward the spigot, but, didn’t quite make it out of the fire pit.
I'm always a little bit astounded by how many people come out of the woodwork anytime you put the word "Free" in front of something, and that was the case here too. I don't think I've ever seen my beloved comic shop so packed, and the best part was, most of them were buying other things while there as well.
I know, I know, I haven't been around but I am here now.
As I gasped and stepped back from the crib, I realized the look on his face was my mother’s expression. The tone in his voice was her tone and the tremble of his chin was her fighting back the tears at being able to reach through and touch her youngest daughter. When I caught my breath I said,”I miss you too Mom!”
5-story department stores
Divide and conquer is an age-old elite strategy. That’s why they love Third World immigration in the first place.
If you think that the past examples of horrible movie artwork from other countries have been bad...well, you'd be right. However, there are always more and more examples of such lurid nastiness in art that have yet to be unearthed.
The overall Brit Writers’ Awards winner – former Shropshire teacher Catherine Cooper for her children’s novel The Golden Acorn: The Adventures of Jack Brenin – was not only crowned Unpublished Writer of the Year 2010 and awarded with an impressive £10,000 prize, but she got an amazing surprise too. Unbeknown to anyone except a tiny handful of people, we had arranged for Catherine’s novel to be published in time for the evening, ready to be distributed in UK shops this week!
It was a simple Christmas this year, and I loved it. I envision more of the same with the freedom of less stuff.
A) A family member
- The People's Parliament
You know that light
Here are pics of my Christmas Sour Cream Containers. Again, they are filled with M&M's. I used Christmas colored ones this time.
I am one lucky lady who has a big room dedicated to my crafting, but with so much room to spread out, I neglected to realize the importance of organizing all my stuff from the beginning. Once it began to get out of control, something HAD to be done! So, recently, I started an honest attempt at getting my scraproom in order. After all, if I'm going to continue to invite all of you in for tutorials, I must clean it up. My mom would be horrified at me having company when it's such a mess!
So once in the door I wade into a sea of smiling faces. Smiling shark like faces. Sharks with daggers and special candy in their fin. Guess we’re all just a school of sharks in this room. Only with the nod of a head from anyone under thirty would you know that the Paul Bots had infiltrated this shin dig like fluid oil seeping into every crevice of every cog in the machinery of a terrifying behemoth know as the neoconservative republican party. Everything starts out pleasant but like a duck whose glide is on the surface graceful; underneath that thing is brewing up a storm of uspeakables. The unexpected swell of bodies in this little meeting one by one go to have their names checked off the roll and get their super special kids club membership badge. Then a mad dash to the coffee and doughnuts. I don’t even eat doughnuts and I dashed because I just want to eat the republican party’s doughnut so, so bad. Me and Red try to act casual with our little Styrofoam cups in one hand and our Dixie plate in the other with aforementioned doughnut snugly on top. We’re not casual though. We’re only acting casual because what we are really doing is scoping this joint out. We are eyeballing for anyone with and ‘END THE FED’ button or a ‘Don’t Tread on Me’ meanie snake ready to strike. After a one over we turn in our paypaz and mingle for a moment with other subversives who we know for sure are on our side. Once the meeting is called into session everything was still all smiles and to the uninformed it would appear as if that would not change. To them it would seem this would be a quick in and out. Oh…the uninformed were in for a real bottom of the cearel box treat and I’m not talking about the one’s you have to cut off the box and put together. No sir I speak of the ones you use to race your siblings to the bottom of the sugary, chemical filled, breakfast supplement box in order to claim it as your own. From this point on I’m going from memory and have only that to rely on as to what transpired so I apologize beforehand if any of my exact exactments turns out to be not exactly precise.
today I have my cards to share with you from Thursday nights
According to official police statistics, 27 pedestrians were killed in Paris in 2011. 45% of them were crossing the street when the light wasn't green or were crossing in the middle of the road rather than at a crosswalk.
I'm thinking of having just one layer of blue between each flower, since my flowers are so big. They are 16 inches! My hexies are 3 1/2 inches. How many flowers should I make? Should I make 12 and have six on top and six on the bottom? I have "extras" that were left over after doing a set of colors, like 3 purples which is not enough for more flowers, a lot of neutrals, and some of every color. I was thinking of using them to make a single line border (around the quilt) of all the hexies with the colors all mixed together, and then a border of blue hexies, before finishing it off. I have another purple that came with theses batiks that i can cut if needed. What do you think? I have no idea what I'm doing and am just making it up as I go. Any suggestions are welcomed. I'm also not sure how to add the border, do I just cut the sides to make them even after stitching or do I cut the blues in half before stitching them on?
And my point is a series of questions to you people:
In 1995, 430,000 pair of Hush Puppies were sold. The following year, Hush Puppy sold four times that number! In 1996 Hush Puppy won the prize for “best accessory” at the Council of Fashion Designers awards event at Lincoln Center. Baxter and Owen took the stage flanked by Calvin Klein and Donna Karan. Baxter was the first to admit that his company had little to do with the newfound success.
3.Tired Of You
Menus at 43€ with two dishes or one dish and cheese or dessert, 53€ with two dishes and cheese or dessert and 63€ with two dishes cheese and dessert. The 29€ three course lunch menu (Mon-Fri) looks like a bargain.
January 31, 2011 -
Cousar states: “Paul uses an inordinately high number of exhortations to encourage the Philippians in their task to remain faithful and steadfast” (p. 13). This observation needs to be felt rather than seen. It is a subjective opinion but I would agree with Cousar. The epistle does have an exhortative feel to it.
My dad loved and was very touched with the flannel strip quilt I made a few weeks ago! Is is a bit of a techi and enjoys a good challenge, so we gave him a Kindle Touch. Both gifts, as well as having all of us with him together, made his Christmas!
But I am also saddened by those who reach their golden years who don’t know Jesus personally; they’ve never communed with God. Their hearts aren’t warmed by hymn tunes like “Tis so Sweet to Trust in Jesus” or “In the Garden” where the hymn writer described communion with God as, “He walks with me and He talks with me, and He tells me I am His own. And the joy we share as we tarry there none other has ever known.”
Source:I Luv South Africa Blog
A crippling blow to a half-hearted friend,
Course II was amazing as well. "Coast and Shoreline" It was Wild Spiced Swordfish Belly with rosehip puree, smoked ham and Sea lettuce dashi, and periwinkles and sea beans.
I was thinking about this today because of my upcoming adventure to Florida. I got to thinking about spending time with 4 women who I really don’t “know” all that well. I have met one of them in person, served in the church choir with her, but I didn’t know her then and we have both changed so much that I am sure we will have to get to know each other all over again.
She isn’t fazed, and good for her. The woman fights with conviction and does Brahim Pasir Mas really want to engage her in a rational argument? I think he’d lose.
This book, at more than 1,000 pages, is highly intimidating and daunting. All you can think of when you see it is, "How am I going to finish this?" But then you look at the description and you say, "Hm, this is a very interesting concept." I took the latter thought when deciding to buy the book.
Gabe & Mj having fun in the water!
Amanpour: good point Paul
Excuse me, young lady, you’re quite beautiful if i may say so; you don’t happen to have an STD, do you ?
What a week. We’ve been huddled up at home, braving the ever-changing Indiana weather, and loving being complete.
Exasperating and offensive as it is to see the emblems of evil made into toys and party-favours, we cannot prevent it and the centuries to come shall not be commanded to maintain our rage.
If we love only those who are loving to us too,
“Thank you,” Rayloth said then, nodding toward the still-crying mother and daughter, he added, “I’ll leave you alone with your wife and daughter. I’m sure you want a chance to hug her, too.” With that, he gave Gunthar’s hand one final shake then made his way through the crowd and headed for the bay their ship was docked in.
Are there any action figure collectors out there that live in Central Alberta Canada? I would love to see your collection and share my own with you. It would be cool to have someone to go to the toy aisles with. Maybe we can make it a monthly mall visit thing with lunch. I was even accept the companionship with people who don't like action figures but who think it would be fun to just hang out with me (and they would be right).
I have a mixture of architecture, birds, and flowers from which to choose ~ (plus there’s a lot more on the Etsy site).
I've seen a few recipes that call for a layer of melted chocolate in between the pie crust and the pastry cream, to keep the crust from getting soggy, so I decided to try it. First, I blind baked my pie crust, using my favorite Martha recipe (1 cup flour, 1/2 teaspoon sugar, 1/2 teaspoon salt, 1 stick of butter, and ice water to bring it together). Then after it cooled, I spread on a thin layer of melted dark chocolate. While that set in the fridge, I prepared a batch of pastry cream (I used the recipe from my bostom cream pie birthday cake) and also let it cool in the fridge.
My little school threw benefit horse shows each spring to raise money for our sports program before insurance forbade public fun and diving boards. In addition to allowing horses on our soccer field, we had a Jack Russell terrier as a school mascot. “Bandit” hung out in our classrooms in the days prior to chronic animal dander allergies. Childhood had more dog hair and philosophical potential before humans developed an intolerance for the same lead paint I used to nibble from my crib slats. I personally believe all the fun stopped when that douche with the coffee burns sued McDonald’s and won. Liability has certainly taken the kick out of kids’ memories these days. We’ve all turned into, like, total pussies.
For who among the dead remembers you? Who praises you in Sheol?
Not that this behavior is ok for anyone.
IAG will have to incur the ongoing running costs of the subsidiaries until they can find a new buyer or decide to close them down, but this is a great piece of business for the group, which acquired 42 coveted Heathrow slots as part of the deal.
Contact Reservations
Having said all that, however, I do want to address a couple of misconceptions about justification. The purpose of this lesson is to try to make Justification very simple to understand, but remember, the deeper into theology we go, the more practical it gets.
This is the power of the Christian story friends. When we start moving towards God, when we set our eyes on Him, the journey becomes one of joy and transformation. As I jogged I was free to stop worrying about each step and simply enjoy what I was experiencing. Each mammoth boulder became a place to pause and look over the Strait, each new discovery a thing to bring me joy. A tiny starfish which I grabbed and threw back into the water. The rushing tide. A bald eagle perched in the Douglas Fir tree. As I moved, I was able to experience more and more beauty.
Now the wait begins..... Fingers crossed!!
Opening track Rangda sets a very different tone than anything previously heard with the use of the Gamelan at the forefront of the mix, laying a hypnotic groove and slightly creepy feeling. It’s a bold way to start but one that builds the tension and anticipation. Cyclin comes next with a more familiar brass-driven sound. Organ and guitar battle, layering the funk as the mood lifts up a notch or two. Togetherness drives on into full Afrobeat and funk. For fans of earlier material, it’s here that the album really hits.
The Secret of Her Eyes (Argentina)
7. Tandoor - Great Indian food at decent prices. I love the staff - they always crack me up. The menu is diversified, with choices from all different regions of India, including some of the best Rogan Josh I've ever had. And, hey, let's not forget the Peshwari Naan. Perfect.
Both Newman and Rothko would have probably balked at the achievement of Palermo in the largest room of the LACMA exhibition, where he used purchased fabric to mimic painting, offering expanses of color and wispy transitions of hues. They smack of a Duchampian joke on Newman and Rothko yet they have the visual impact, they have the punch. That they are cloth and not paint is no matter to Palermo. “I believe in you guys,” he seems to be saying, “just allow me to find your beauty in things other than paint.”
If the outside hinted at something more interesting, the inside was just amazing. An incredibly long U-shaped bar with brown art nouveau-type tiling, these huge decorative lanterns on the bar counter, a tiled mosaic floor, stained, coloured and painted glass all over, a Laurieston Bar-style pie heater and an elaborately dark wood-paneled side-room - all told, quite stunning.
Other fun moments of this week: Around 43 minutes into the live performances (according to Hulu), check out Chris Mann and Erin Willett posing in the background as Christina Milian interviews Jamar and Lindsey. Plus, Team Adam and Team Cee Lo performed together, as did Team Christina and Team Blake! Fun times.
These mobile islands of ice would be temporarily repurposed, turned into science labs at sea. Researchers would simply ride them till they melted, often quite far south into the waters of the North Atlantic.
But the problem now is deeper than then. Capitalism has lost its underlying oomph; investment was low, remember, even before the recession. And this suggests that its vitality cannot be restored by policy measures, be they Keynesian (“boost demand”) or Thatcherite (“attack workers“).
coiled yellow string
Than to put confidence in princes.
Ok, my big bad games countdown is coming soon. NES rocks.
Use them again and again!
One of the ideas behind ‘Soapbox’ was this: I was sick of people dissing Bradford. I couldn’t understand why they didn’t see how great this city is and why they didn’t love her. I wasn’t blind – I could see the issues here, and still can. (Even just last night a stranger stopped me in the street and asked me if I do skunk. True story). But I’d fallen in love with this city, and it made me mad that seemingly few others felt as passionate about her as I did. So I had a vague idea of doing something ‘prophetic’: I wrote a love song for Bradford. It’s not all we sung about, but it was in our set as we gigged locally. My thinking was, ‘People sing about New York all the time, a place far from perfect, so why NOT Bradford?’ (NB: Love covers a multitude of sins).
and of course the disclaimer! Our house is ALWAYS "under construction" as many would say. And our "To Do" list never shrinks; it's just keeps growing and growing. So please give my hubs a great big old sympathy hug the next time you see him, because he is always seen toting around his tool box and tape measure and I always have a project for that "honey do list".
Let us take as an example a man who dies leaving 3 children and a spouse. The only property is the house they are living in. If the widow’s name is in the title as half-owner, she continues to own half the house. The other half of the house constitutes the estate which is divided equally between the 3 children. When the estate is settled, each child will own one third of the title in half of the house, i.e. each of them owns one sixth of the house, and the title deed has four names on it (the widow and each of the three children). The widow is, however, entitled to hold a usufruct (lifetime use) of the children’s share. This means she can stay in the property until she dies.
I have started a series of bluebell inspired items. I am greatly enjoying creating the textured layers of the woodlands. The embroidered bluebells are added last.
If someone among us sold all he had and gave it away to the poor, to others who had needs, they would be labeled as a nut and I am sure relatives or others would take them to court and seek to have them declared incompetent to handle their affairs. I remember a teacher in a Sunday school class one time stating that he was glad that God didn’t require Christians to sacrifice in their giving. In fact he seemed to indicate that it was irresponsible for a follower of Christ to do so. This was quite a while back and I remember biting my tongue, holding my thoughts back because I didn’t want to cause controversy.
5. Use a title of a book as your page title
Students at USU pass by sculptures on their way to class, participate in time-honored traditions such as standing on the Block A to kiss on True Aggie Night and play pranks on the pieces of artwork across campus. Some sculptures are rarely ever seen, and wait like gems to be found in hidden crevices of the university.
We had a very pleasant, if very chilly few days in Amsterdam. We took an open top bus tour of Amsterdam, went on a canal cruise, walked for miles, saw diamonds being polished and visited Anne Frank's house. I had read that visitors to the house commented that the hairs on the back of their neck stood up on entering the house and truly they did!
Sure. I'm agressively desired by women all over the world. (Ha! This is MY meme and ya gotta take MY answers at face value, ok?)
turn the music up, and fuckin’ rock out with your cock out
I noticed that everytime I have to pick an artist at the train station/airport, I miss my train. This is why I was soo late when I picked Josh and the guys at CdG... Ok, reason number two, they wanted some fresh air and moved two or three times and I lost myself in the airport !
Obama: "Meh" we can believe in.
In talking with other employers, we all agree: When we see young people coming in today to apply/interview for a job, our first impression is of the stereotypical Generation Y entitlement individual, and that means your interview starts off rocky and uphill.
“What was most interesting was just how little impact bin Laden’s death had,” he said, pointing to the lack of mass demonstrations or promised major terror strikes.
The homeowners must elect a representative body to govern/operate the building/association. Those who are in charge of the decision making process become your neighbors. These people are elected to a Board of Directors by the membership to represents each homeowner’s best interest for the community.
MONDAY NITE/TUESDAY MORNING: At this late hour it seems the worst has been confirmed. Art Chicago in the Park 2006 is not to be.
Anyway, the conversation got me to thinking. One, it showed me just how much men and women don’t see interactions the same sometimes, but more importantly it showed me just how guarded I’ve been in my past. The truth is that it cost me nothing to change my flight (yay Southwest and their no change fee policy!), and the flight leaving on Monday was actually cheaper than the original one. So why would I have chosen not to stay? To prove a point? P Dawg, and subsequently S_Lyphe, was right… that mentality hadn’t gotten me very far in the past. And even though I’ve been saying that this year I’m doing things differently… there was clearly something that made me uneasy about staying for him.
Spring, St. Patrick's Day, SXSW and another Black Star Co-op Beer Social are upon us! Next Saturday, March 17th, we will be hosting our monthly Beer Social. We hope you will make time out of what looks to be a very busy day in Austin to come and enjoy some homebrew, good company, and an opportunity to learn more about the world's first cooperatively owned
boss i am afraid that what
the sofa, Alexandria, Trujillo. You looked
Our Daily Bread designs Second Anniversary Celebration Challenges: Sneak Peek!
the wind I do
Today, we've gone back to a more decorous (and decorative) time. And I think by adding things to our craft we have subtracted much.
Also, Ben and I devote much of our time to playing Super Mario World.
Immediately I was torn. I wanted to go with my usual instinct when confronted by a celebrity, treat them like anyone else (ie ignore them) to show how cool I am/ not invade their space (a technique I also used to use on boys I fancied, to limited success surprisingly). But then again if I was standing right next to any other mum in the playground I would definitely say something to them, and had already conversed with random mums about the age of our children, the best kind of scooter to buy, the relative ease of second children (not) and so on. So I was filled with confusion.
Lies in his bed, walks up and down with me,
While the dough is rising make Garlic butter, Blend garlic cloves and chopped coriander and Mint leaves into a paste with a tsp of water.
Dotted along the streets grey taxis
The Vampire Next Door
Julian Johnson, MPS, MA: Julian Johnson is a non-profit executive with masters degrees in non-profit management and developmental psychology. He is a longtime student of mysticism and a member of the Rosicrucian Order for more than 35 years. In 1999, he helped organize a conference in New York under the theme “Where Mysticism Meets Science,” bringing together scientists from a number of disciplines who presented empirical research supporting concepts in the teachings of Eastern and Western mystical traditions.
Last week I took a nine day trip to the south of Russia with the group of American students studying at my university. We took a 30 hour train ride south to Rostov-on-Don, where I took the opportunity to wade in the Don River and sing the classic Sisqo hit “The Don Song” (let me see that Don-da-don-don-don).
The one in which Angel bums out the world by revealing Jasmine to be a gross demon. This is kind of the real season finale, even there is another episode. A good showcase of how messed up Connor is at this point.
(You've been very busy with projects, you know.)
Blessed are those who are persecuted because of righteousness, for theirs is the kingdom of heaven.
5. Its a tragedy to keep your happiness to yourself and heartbreaking to not allow your friends to help you bear your sorrows.
This show might just about be finished. NBC doesn’t really know what to do with it, so we might have a very few precious episodes left. Sure these characters are selfish and cruel, but at least they have each other. We get the awesome friendship of Troy and Abed, angry, slightly racist Pierce, young naive Annie, holier-than-thou Shirley, and the awkward will-they-won’t-they-maybe-they-shouldn’t almost romance of Jeff and Britta. We get episodes all about Dungeons and Dragons, worlds with alternate timelines and where shows such a “Inspector Spacetime” (Doctor Who) and Cougarton Abbey (a mix between Cougartown and Downton Abbey) exist. We get rants about Legos and still wonder why the dean likes to dress up as Dalmations and why Chang sleeps in the air vents. It’s a hilarious show with an amazing cast of odd characters. If this show is cancelled then we are indeed in the darkest timeline.
Okay so as you all know I went to see the midnight showing of The Hunger Games movie last night with friends. I was so excited for this. I re-read the book the night before, couldn’t sleep and all. I couldn’t wait to see how they brought the book I loved to life. And let me tell you I was not disappointed.
You really are a very talented bunch, keep up the great work peeps!!
!res class lzw ?(bits=8) out = let count = 1 lsl bits in let clear_code = count and end_of_info = count + 1 in object (self) val table : (int * int, int) Hashtbl.t = Hashtbl.create 5003 val mutable code_size = 0 val mutable next_code = 0 val mutable buffer = 0 val mutable length = 0 method append n =
So that night once I finished baking the all the cakes and cupcakes, I sat down to pack the cupcakes up which would be the favors. I asked Jobin to help me with it because it was already late in the night and I was really sleepy after the productive day. But once I was on it, there was no looking back, I don't know where I got the energy from and where all the tiredness went off to.
- Jon B, Manchester, 01/3/2012 16:20
I'm loving the new look. It's very Mrs. Duh... quirky, bright,and slightly girly. This is a great way to commemorate my three year Blog-a-versary! Thanks again, Bre!
Questions
If you have ever studied Freud you will know that he bases a lot on the sexual and the battle between the Id, Ego and Super Ego (I won’t bore you with that)
First of all, before we go to the hotel, we stopped at a town called New Paltz and had lunch at this restaurant called "The Village Tearoom".
3oz Skyy Dragonfruit Vodka
bite of DUI ass, their faces hidden
I think the worst part in all of this, is literally no one understands why I feel this way. "Lora, you'll love it" "Lora, this will be so good for him." Yeah, I get that. I also get that my one and only purpose for living is now going to be gone all day and I have no idea what the hell to do with myself.
I agree, along with everyone else, that this is a great novel. It has kept me up late at night saying things like “wow,” “damn,” “what the f#&k?!” I went through various emotions while reading. Sometimes it got so intense that I had to put the novel aside and remind myself to breathe and that it’s just a story.
Okay...so I am finally giving in and admitting that the holidays are over...
First we needed to scrape as much of the build up off as possible. Let me just say Weber lids are a lot tougher than you realize. After about an hour of heavy-duty scrubbing we were finally able to get all the build-up off.
11. Arawak Indian - Who Is Don
I think became emotional for many reasons. When she named all the actresses of color, who came before her, who were never recognized for their talent; the women who are next to her in the industry that are never recognized; and the possibility of a door being opened for future women in Hollywood- that touched me deeply.
dough while frozen; let thaw slightly. Assemble
* One arrested for reusing injection syringes
There are many remarkable characteristics to this novel. The first is the relationships between the characters. I think perhaps it has a lot to with the fact that nearly every character that appears in this novel is female. The males are usually talked about amongst them and one of them sends a letter but they never actually appear with the exception of Father Romero who comes to hear Serafina’s confession.
The island planting in the middle of the drive has been over-grown with various junipers planted around a tall stunning blue spruce. These all may have been small once but junipers surrounding the tree had grown into tall fat spears that choked the spruce and apparently many other things. Don’t get me wrong I like junipers is the right place, this isn’t it. We had a friend cut down most of them, revealing five rose bushes and a lovely variety of daffodils, crocus, and hyacinths struggling to peek through and bloom. I took the lopping shears and secateurs and attacked the rest of the over growth, uncovering a honeysuckle twining into the spruce and just about everything else, various non-functioning solar light spikes and long strands of wild blackberry. (Damn I though we had none of it on the property.) I wore these great new gloves made from leather with nylon net, side finger gussets. The gloves have long wrist straps that velcro around and keep the gloves in place as you work. I LOVE them! I usually don’t like gardening gloves but these are swell and my hands don’t look like a cotton picker’s after harvest.
The law of death – physical and spiritual
At the time of his offence, Puay was a member of the “369″ secret society.
At Lovers’ Loop Retreat, our affordable Asheville bed and breakfast alternative, you’re close to all of these freebies. Contact us at 828-545-2950 or loversloop(at)gmail(dot)com.
Note: Because we are sponsored weekly by wonderful businesses who have graciously donated products and in the interest of fairness to all participants, any entries that do not follow our simple challenge rules will remain in the gallery but will not be eligible for the weekly prizes. Thanks for your understanding and participation!
America’s Got Talent starts tonight…or as I like to call it, America Ain’t Got No Mother F**kin’ Talent. It’s like Ted Mack’s Amateur Hour, only worse. I still watch it though. Kind of like the same way that I watch horrible car accidents on the freeway or people jumping out of burning buildings. This year is will be quit horrid. Why? Well, it’s bad enough that Howie Mandel is a judge, but now…ugh…Howard Stern is a judge.
Actually, having now sampled the three most exotic Laughing Buddha beers, it seems more likely that the conversation didn't start with beer at all, but food. Northwesterners have really taken to Asian cuisine--in addition to the myriad Thai, nouveau Chinese, Malay, Korean, Cambodian, and Indian restaurants now festooning our neighborhoods, the techniques and ingredients of Asia are also drifting, as if by osmosis, into non-Asian dishes. It was only a matter of time before they drifted into the brew kettle as well.
Hybrid Meetings and Events
I am not lazy to pray
I’ve tried to keep this article almost childlike in its simplicity, with the hope that it may attract a wider audience and that readers may forward the article to younger viewers. Mature Christians who have a thorough knowledge of the Bible will immediately perceive that I have subtly associated the development of religion (in its basic primitive form) with certain elements of Astronomy. I hope this does not offend Christians in any way.
BJORK,Debut
Initial sketch, front view:
No final kiss to seal any sins
Click
And then the lists. THE Lists. The LISTS! To-do. To-bake. To-give. To-send. And, like most kids, To-get. You know, THE big WISH LIST!?
Next was Meeting House Hill with its big rollers, more sand and dust everywhere. A car went by, and you couldn’t see it from behind – just dust. Head down, follow the guy in front of me. Go fast on the down hills, hope for the best. We got to the top of the last hill and there was no one in sight behind us – just us two. Working together we had no intention of letting anyone catch us. Turn onto Stage Road, which I had scouted the day before – right after passing the second covered bridge. I liked this hill – packed dirt, nice incline – and long. Just my kind of hill. Cranking up it, I took the lead. I love hills, they give me new energy. And the pain disappeared. Wait, did I just past another one from my group? (#579 – appeared beat and broken) No sense thinking about it now. Got to the fallen tree on the right 20 meters from the top – that was the sign to step on it (as Hank taught me during his training week). Lo and behold, looked back as I crested and my buddy 596 was nowhere to be seen. Hmm, not really a climber? (afterward he told me it was fatigue). OK, having read Hank’s report from last year, I knew it was time to take no chances. I would lose a sprint if it came down to that. Back to the time trial mode and the pain – down the hills peddling hard, taking the corners clean and fast, and then to the 3 miles of flats. It was at this point I learned how I could rest my elbows in the top bar and get REAL aero – easy to do since it was straight. Sort of a relaxed upper body while the legs (actually feet) were in serious pain. Shut up feet! Do as I tell you! Around the corner to the last 400 meters – looked back – there was a guy that looked just like my buddy -only 10 meters back. OK, I don’t sprint real well, but I do have power for 400 meters. Through to the finish, clean. Actually, it wasn’t him after all – 579 ended up 35 seconds behind me. No idea how I did until they reported – fifth! Satisfying . . . given the flat. Guess there were five in that first group with the one I passed (596 – came in seventh) on Stage Road Hill.
-In the mean time ,prepare the gravy.
Reigate
#3. Group Coupons
This is a political year and there are some 600,000 public offices up for election throughout the nation. Though it is not widely known, the majority of Americans self-identify as politically conservative. For them Craig Copland has written the 2012 Conservative Election Handbook: Everything You Need to Know to Elect Conservatives from Dog Catcher to President ($14.95, available in various e-reader formats at www.conservawiki.com and elsewhere). This is an excellent book that covers all aspects of planning, running, and winning an election. (It’s even available for free if you are a conservative running for office.) While its purpose is to elect conservatives, this book is so thorough that, it must be said, a liberal candidate would benefit just as much from it. I have seen a number of such books over the years and this qualifies as one of the best.
9:00 PM Eastern 5/4/2012
or perhaps the insulation for future endeavors.
12 MacEwan Ballroom, Calgary, AB CANADA
And it was because I was so deeply engrossed in this book, I didn’t see the soccer ball that came directly at me, smashing into the side of my head causing my jaw to sing, my neck to do that little whiplash thing, and my reading glasses to quietly embed themselves into the bridge of my nose.
Bene+dic, Domine, creaturam istam cerevisiae, quam ex adipe frumenti producere dignatus es: ut sit remedium salutare humano generi, et praesta per invocationem nominis tui sancti; ut, quicumque ex ea biberint, sanitatem corpus et animae tutelam percipiant. Per Christum Dominum nostrum.
Another deplorable feature of post-war fashion is the peaked cap for civilians: this, however, is so far confined to districts like Strasbourg, St Denis and La Vilette, and goes with a grubby raincoat and a toothbrush moustache. Small boys wear rabbit skins sewn together when it is cold and dungarees or battle-dress when it is warm.
When you start studying Law, you’d better be ready for a good argument. If you’ve not got the basic skills for that, you’d better learn. And quickly. Much of studying and practicing law is putting across your side of an argument across, and if all you can bring to the table is “I’m right because I am”, then you’re dead in the water.
Full set of investment cast lugs; sloped fork crown; bottom
David and I are extremely blessed to not only have jobs in this economy, but to have jobs we love. Working in schools is one of the most rewarding jobs out there. This year David moved from being a 4th grade teacher to the principal of the school that he has taught in for the past five years. Each year his school has a theme, and the music teacher writes a song to go with that theme.
Roshon & Chelsie – 28
If you practice yoga, no doubt you're aware of its health benefits. But like any physical activity, it's not completely risk free. If you've been practicing for long, you or someone you know has probably pulled a hamstring, tweaked a sacrum, or experienced some injury while on the mat. Close to 9,000 Americans received medical treatment for yoga-related injuries in 2004 and 2005, according to the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission. Still, there are only two yoga injuries reported for every 10,000 times it is practiced, according to American Sports Data.
Miss Lady Liberty herself.
Dialogue: 6,0:00:18.49,0:00:25.25,Default,,0000,0000,0000,,Nevertheless, I don’t think that all high school students desire a rose-colored life.
‘Cause my world revolves around you
“Good music is honest as it is straight from the heart, passionate.”
“That nothing is static or fixed, that all is fleeting and impermanent, is the first mark of existence. It is the ordinary state of affairs. Everything is in process. Everything—every tree, every blade of grass, all the animals, insects, human beings, buildings, the animate and the inanimate—is always changing, moment to moment.”
-end by thanking for spend time.
Again, just to reiterate this pair of blogs was inspired by the song “Do It Now” by the great Ingrid Michaelson.
My friend Shelly asked if I'd like to run 30 minutes on MWF mornings 5:15am with her. I made to 2/3 this week. Not too bad! It feels good to get back into a routine. We tell the runners in our programs that consistency is the key to a healthy running lifestyle. I'm attempting to set a good example.
Prediction (Pacers 4-1)
What has happened in Massachusetts is that people are now paying the fine because health insurance is so expensive. And you have a pre-existing condition clause in yours, just like Barack Obama.
Alligators - They have them and in abundance. They will not eat you unless you are stupid. If you are stupid, and you know who you are, stay home. That goes for noisy, reckless, a litter bug, or just plain ignorant. This river and all the plants and animals who live in it were here long before you were. Try and remember you are visiting their home and use some of that common sense and common courtesy that seems so rare these days.
There, Lina is confronted by Gloria and Trey, so she stays at Malibu and becomes Captain of The Sea Lions again. The next day at school, half of the Sea Lions squad quits because of Lina’s routines and practices. Avery and Kayla approach Lina, Christina, and Sky to tell them that they are dreaming if they think they have a chance at winning the Spirit Championship. Sky loses her temper and tells them to back off, otherwise a fight would start.
10:43 PM – The lovely and always subdued, Vickie is here to introduce her men. Both of them are talented, and at least one of them is perfection. I’ll let you guess which one. Ziggler kicks things off with Hornswaggle. Once the Funkasaurus is tagged in, Vickie interferes in an attempt to save her men. The attempt backfires and Vickie leaves the ring screeching, while Brodus and Horswaggle celebrate.
Please email me so I can forward your information to LORi Boyd!
Next I came across another quite typical photo of some elders (title for young LDS missionaries) walking, facing the camera. I love this photo because it really captures the society in which they are serving.
I leave for Dubois, PA in the morning to attend a Pennwriters board of directors meeting. In the past I was only able to attend one meeting a year. The one on the eve of the annual conference. This one promises to be more detailed and much longer. I’m looking forward to it.
I have started baking 4 years ago...yet, I couldn't move too far away from simple bakes such as muffins and cookies. Many fellow home bakers who began their baking journey way after me are already displaying baking skills...in my opinion, which has already surpassed or at least equivalent to professional pastry chefs! They never failed to wow me with challenging bakes such as those lovely French macaroons, delicious choux puff pastry, gorgeous layered cakes, dainty desserts, fondant sugarcraft, and even challenging breads such as sourdough.
You don’t have to have a blog to play along with the sketch challenge. If you upload your project to any on-line galleries or forums, please use the keyword of WMSC87. As always you are welcome and encouraged to upload your project to your album in the Waltzingmouse Stamps Gallery!
11. “There is hardly a life that has gone untouched in New Jersey by the horrifying assault on American soil that took place on September 11th and today, after years of waiting, justice has finally been delivered.” – New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie (May 2011)
I'm so excited to announce our new stamps for January. Three beautiful and very useable floral sets. I managed to get in some playtime with these over the Christmas holiday and found myself reaching for the inktense pencils and copic markers quite a bit.
We can say that we have only been here to help, as while we are all indeed so very close to Earth and humanity and feel such a Love, such an eternal bond with humanity, we are not in fact the deciders of when and how events manifest on your world.
I don't feel too involved.
Then I had to get the key to get into Everling’s room which I vaguely recalled killing some mobs in a room close by. I chose to cheat at this point and brought up the Allakhazam.com page for the quest. This sped things up dramatically.
So my lucky day came last Friday while I was
But bitter
In all seriousness, Prof. Krauss, you ought (moral) to take your own advice and be honest with your readers. Claim what you wish to claim, not what you think is going to sell more copies of your book, essentially playing a bait and switch with your readers, and then bitterly complain when “moronic” philosophers dare to point that out.
When I worked there Kodak had their hands in lots of things. Chemicals. Medical Devices. Motion Pictures. Copiers. And, of course, cameras and film. As others have supplanted them from their leadership position they've gradually sold off one business after another in order to curb expenses and focus on their core business. And now - there's nothing more to sell except their patents.
To get up
2 ~ Do I need a theme?
Me: My story sucks.
(Vinicius de Moraes, Pixinguinha)
So, after careful thinking and a lot of thought, I finally came up with my favorite idea.
Then, I reminded myself I’m not in America anymore, nor am I at a ballpark. Koreans! Give yourselves just a couple of hours away from the phone, will ya?
Meeshka tells us that other characters may follow, so let's hope! After seeing this Queen of Hearts, I can't wait to see what Mo can do with the Mad Hatter!
because the lab where I worked used them for testing
This October (7 - 17 Oct 2011), I visited Italy on a group-tour package provided by one of the tour agencies in Singapore. My intention was to be in Italy to experience and to appreciate the architecture in parts of Italy as well as the natural landscape.
I’m not going to play it down: living here is a dream come true, and I’m reminded of that a thousand times a day. But everyone has bad days now and again (like yesterday, when I stepped in actual human excrement), but no matter how awful it gets, I love to sit in the park or watch the passers-by from a café and say to myself, “At least you’re not having this day in Wisconsin.” (Works every time.)
I would love to nap all day and watch some cheesy 90s prom movies.
I'd love to see AK make a comeback, though I doubt it ever will. At least commercially. There's no reason why you home brewers can't bring it back to life at home.
RIFT, by Andrea Cremer
Do our people know their death awaits, surely they too can see what is plain to me, and if they do, can it be they really do not care? Is there nothing left of the Britain that we were? Has our blood run cold?
Here are some ladies who rocked the red
Gray Tee
Close to the memorial is one of the most famous parts of the Berlin Wall located, the East Side Gallery. The East Side Gallery is a 1.3 km long remaining part of the Berlin Wall containing over a hundred mural paintings form artists all over the world. It is the largest open-air gallery in the world and contains very famous artworks like Dimitrji Vrubel´s “The Mortal Kiss”.
The Attorney General announced at the Post Cabinet press briefing on Thursday 1st April that the full Uff Commission Report will be laid in the Senate on Tuesday 6th April – see http://guardian.co.tt/news/politics/2010/04/02/uff-report-senate-tuesday. I was pleased to hear that, but there remained a widespread attitude of skepticism as to the outcome of the AG’s promise. One can hardly blame people for having those feelings since, as TTTI’s President, Victor Hart, has recently reminded us, PM Manning broke his promise to publish the report of the Bernard Commission into the Piarco Airport project. That was over 6 years ago and still no Bernard Report yet.
Sheesh…
Do you ever have days like this?
This week was Marc Jacobs’s fall fashion show for Louis Vuitton and was it over-the-top! It paid homage to the company’s origins as a luggage purveyor. The images and video amazed me, as I'm not one who's usually very interested in runway shows.
“May this tree be blessed by the powers of the east and the air; we thank and honor her for the clear, pure air she will provide.”
If you’re looking for an easy way to get your child to practice their math skills, this just may be it. Build your own rocket, blast off into outer space, and play a math mission. It’s fun and challenging to build a rocket that will actually stay in orbit without crashing back to earth and steering while answering math questions makes it a challenging video game. There are many math missions with several difficulty levels. Topics include addition, subtraction, telling time, counting money, shapes, multiplication, division, fractions, more. We’ve been using this app for several months and it’s not only provided lots of math practice but also hours of fun.
These issues would not have been so serious were it not for the fact that some of the Afrikaner elite either defend the application of these policies, or may even be actively involved in their application. Prominent Afrikaner businessman are known to implement BEE and AA with gusto, doing great harm to the economic and social well-being of Afrikaners in mid- and lower-level positions, and stories of Afrikaners being forced to train their own replacements before they are retrenched can easily be found. Young Afrikaners may find themselves stranded with no access to scholarships or entry-level positions. BEE transactions have created a new superclass of rich blacks, at the cost of thousands of Afrikaners who have invested their savings in the stock market, only to see it squandered on such transactions, apparently driven simply by a desire to please the ANC, and with at best a questionable return in the long run. University presidents of previously Afrikaans-medium universities have apparently either not opposed the introduction of English instruction, or have actively colluded with the ANC government to undermine the Afrikaans character of their institutions. In other words, the Afrikaner elite has apparently decided against Afrikaners, or they are unable to decide what is in fact in the best long-term interest of Afrikaners.
2 tablespoons of butter
After that we cycled into the village and bumped into a few friends.
A gypsy woman sat at a scarred wooden table and motioned for me to sit across from her. As I did this, she shuffled a deck of Tarot cards and pulled one from the center of the deck, placing it face up on the table. There were no arcane symbols or etchings on the face of the card as one is accustomed to seeing in the Tarot, but rather a photograph of me. Wordlessly, the gypsy scooped up the card and placed back on the top of the deck, turning them so that I could see the pictures.
I continued to stare at her and then at the lemon and back at her waiting for some kind of apology or some sign that she was sorry or perhaps even human.
The seafoam on the surf comes when a merboy from Lily’s past shows up. Tellin asks Lily for something that clouds her view of the horizon. There’s a future with Quince on land, her loyalty to the kingdom in the sea, and Lily tossing on the waves in the middle. Will she find a way to reconcile her love, her duty, and her dreams?
I would say that before excluding the possibility of such a right to be a part of the actual privacy and data protection sphere, one should analyze profoundly which are the implications of providing a person the right to move his or her collection of data from a service provider to another.
To Madeleine Hanna’s puzzlement and most readers’ exasperated sighs, the traditional marriage plot takes a twist in Eugenides’s new take on an old trope. This might not be the book to read on Valentine’s Day. But it’s a great read on a day when you’re not swamped in sentimentalism. Like tomorrow, for instance.
Also, the sex. I remember when we used to have it. Like animals we were, with her into it as much as me. Sure, I was too rough on her when she was pregnant, but I apologized and she really wanted it. Now she avoids me when I’m in the mood. She’s never in the mood.
"No problem," I said. I poured myself a glass of white and stood in the doorway. Apparently there are floor level drafts in my apartment or else styrofoam peanuts have spirits that cause them to drift across the floor. Like kudzu, they had taken over the front of the apartment. Peanuts in shoes, on the bike, on the bar leg. There was no longer a rug. "Ok, Hel," Papa said. "You just try and get the peanuts off your own body, ok?"
Nicole~
Still photographs often differ from life more by their silence than by the immobility of their subjects. Landscape pictures tend to converge with life, however, on summer nights, when the sounds outside, after we call in children and close garage doors, are small—the whir of moths, the snap of a stick. —R.A., 1985
Close up of my first house square and the first motif.
Listen to the star dog and dispense with your tears?"
The date of publication of the report kept being moved back. Not a good sign. Especially for the shareholders:
Ive got so much to say and so little time to say it. Even now this is a stolen moment I should be working. I should collating something. But it feels good to say hello again. Ive missed this and I hope it wont be months until I come back again to say hi and take a moment to breath.
I don’t think I’ve ever finished any of the Marquis’ books. I always get too aroused. Juliette is my favourite, especially the beginning. I love the stories of beautiful nymphomaniacs corrupting innocent young girls.
I am loving this basket... especially the super cute chalkboard plaque! Nanci even gives a tutorial on her blog of how she made this pretty flower arrangement, doesn't it just look like spring! I think all of us could use a little bit of spring right now. :)
NOTE: Be careful when customizing certain features of your Operating System unless you know that it is not completely necessary for the successful running of your computer.
Spirit Masters are the official ambassadors of WKU, work with the administration, alumni and community to provide a warm reception for guests and welcome every opportunity to promote WKU and exemplify the University’s motto, “The Spirit Makes the Master.”
Caller: "Who am I speaking with?"
"Decades ago our ancestors realized that it is not political ideology, religious belief, race, or nationalism that is to blame for a warring world. Rather, they determined that it was the fault of human personality - of humankind's inclination towards evil, in whatever form that is. They divided into factions that sought to eradicate those qualities they believed responsible for the world's disarray... Those who blamed aggression formed Amity... Those who blamed ignorance became the Erudite... Those who blamed duplicity created Candor... Those who blames selfishness made Abnegation... And those who blamed cowardice were the Dauntless... Working together, these five factions have lived in peace for many years, each contributing to a different sector of society. Abnegation has filled our need for selfless leaders in government; Candor has provided us with trustworthy and sound leaders in law; Erudite has supplied us with intelligent teachers and researchers; Amity has given us understanding councellors and caretakers; and Dauntless provides us with protection from threats both within and without. But the reach of each faction is not limited to these areas. We give one another far more than can be adequately summarized. In our factions, we find meaning, we find purpose, we find life."
6. Dream Sequence Revenge feat. Fashawn and Exile prod by Godlee Barnes aka blu
You countered my argument for same age peer choice with schools and I can't speak about church as an expert. I find faith, fellowship, and spirituality in different ways. When I have gone to churches I have seen a number of people of many ages. I guess youth groups may be more set up by age but I would suggest that people develop at different spiritual rates so perhaps there is a different way. As for sports again I think this is set up in an artificial way. For kids I guess they do this so the competition level will be somewhat fair. There is plenty of research that indicates competition can be damaging but that is a topic for another blog. I played basketball with you and a bunch of other guys and the age range really varied.
Level 15: MP Cost: 26, Damage: 285%, Number of Attacks: 4, 25% to inflict darkness on the enemy and lower it’s accuracy by 15% for 70 seconds. The last attack is critical.
The lyrical aspect is mind-blowing. Ikon’s metaphors and obscure references to all kinds of esoteric and weird shit and Jus Allah’s raw, barbaric delivery make for a dense, almost encyclopedic album; it’s like Salman Rushdie and Umberto Eco said fuck it and started rapping in front of the auditorium instead of giving eloquent speeches about potatoes or whatever the fuck smart people talk about.
Aitraaz (2004)
play hide and seek
the Larkspur and the Water Lily
We were glad.
But he is so wary, wary. Has visions of his life, but in a hiatus as to their implementation—wants to fly, and hasn’t yet started to take off, so resents extra weight.
So, you should expect that I will form RULES regarding ORDER in my meetings and I will have no tolerance for disorder. I will BLOCK ACCESS TO ME towards those who do not maintain in order in reverent submission to God the Father with focus on Jesus Christ, the Word of God, and prayer.
We get lots of phone calls though, here is the latest text I got.......
I felt guilty for my single-minded behavior, like the Jane Fonda character in Barefoot in the Park who can't come out of the honeymoon suite. Cannot. There's good stuff in there, and the rest of the world can just bloody well wait.
“It was kind of like how the Romans used to, you know, conquer villages in the Mediterranean. They’d go in to a little Turkish town somewhere, they’d find the first five guys they saw and they’d crucify them.
none of us
To his great horror his captor had tied several abductees to a tree and was whipping them with a leather whip. Others were lying on the ground slowly dying of starvation and disease. His captor did not care if they died. He seemed to find pleasure in making it happen.
2 What We Do 7:12
The draft will now be considered by the councils Lead member for the Environmental Ray Mashiter before it goes any further.
words and creations all the time. You can find her lovely
Stanza three. Lowly and undeserving, sweet Mary, a virgin, a maiden betrothed to Joseph. And yet what sensible proof is there that she is not defiled? Her gentle and righteous husband has the mind to show kindness and divorce her in secret. And yet again, heaven cannot contain itself. Gabriel, the privileged creature, must call this adoptive father forth by the Gospel that as the babe’s guardian, he will be the very throne-room, guardian cherub seated at the cradle of the Son of God by keeping Mary as his bride. By the believing heart of faith, the truth is known, even as it is hidden within the safe keepings of Mary’s mortal womb. The way, the truth, and the life is in her womb and is taking shape and growing and preparing for arrival. The ponderance of her heart, indeed, it is the very throne of the living, moving, growing Savior.
The problem the Sachs face is that Gupta knows the location of several cadavers here and there, bricked up in the Goldman walls. But not according to Brad Hintz, an analyst at Sanford C. Bernstein & Co. He told Bloomberg today that there’s “no evidence whatsoever” that Goldman Sachs’s investment banking franchise is at risk from the Gupta case. Hmmm.
She hadn't tied up since November 2008.
I love how hard he works to make me smile.
This post was inspired by Nomad who left a comment on my post about finishing two books in one day. ‘Congrats...’ he wrote, ‘This is the future I want. but it scares the shit out of me.’
Hera is the Queen. Our Queen. My Queen.
- Rama dynasty has seven major cities (Seven Rishi's City) with the capital city of Ayodhya where one of the results found are Mohenjo-Daroo.
* At the prom, nearly everyone wore dresses. Yes, including the boys. :-) She's got some hilarious photos. One boy had this Marilyn Monroe look going on, with blonde wig and tiny red dress; he looked gorgeous!
Serve with Naan, serves 4.
Thank you for sharing your lives with us.
Evil has no existence. Indeed, evil, at its root, is a rebellion against God-given existence and its inherent goodness. Thus the Scripture describes Satan as a “murderer” and “the father of lies.” (Jn. 8:44). The two epithets are related. Satan’s rebellion against God and His goodness is also a rebellion against the gift of true existence. Evil has no creative power, no root in true existence. It’s only power is to seek destruction and to distort goodness.
-Zippered laundry bags designed for washing delicates work well as reusable produce bags. They are washable & only cost about 50 cents
Greg Ienco, a journalist at local newspaper La Meuse-Liège, described the scene. "We saw four explosions. I was in a building 200m from Saint Lambert Square," he said. "It was quite incredible. We saw one man on the roof who tried to kill people. This man killed himself with a grenade."
If you like the idea of receiving monthly templates delivered direct to your email, check out how to sign up to the Crafty Templates Club here.
For a people poisoned
Which Lady Love of Clark's is your favorite? Clark Kent's Love life has always been complicated. So much Drama with Lana, Chloe is like a sister who has always had feelings for Clark, and Lois has liked Clark but then like turned into feelings in time because they were destined to be together.
Somehow, however, those simple screws were sourced from seven different countries. And somehow, despite all the distance they were shipped, they wound up in my apartment costing less than five bucks.
We didn't have any Inky Images used this time around so.... :0( no Inky Gift Credit.
That's it. I know, surprising really but that's all I can think of off the top of my head. It did get me thinking of what would my life have been like if? You know, if I had done this rather than that. Not regrets, just wondering how different life would be for me right now. There are a few of those.
Louboutin, famous for the red soles on his stilettos, has made Von Teese, one of his most fiercely loyal customers, appear in the form of a three-dimensional holographic performance to illustrate Louboutin’s earliest design inspiration – the showgirl.
I love Wednesdays but I didn’t love today! I own my own business so I work every day, I am also working on writing a book, being the “best mom in the world” and volunteering for a charity working on their 5km run/walk. Most days I am being pulled 16 different ways. And on top of it all dealing with my eating addiction. Which is where I turn to when I am stressed out! Today I could have ate a horse – I might have if one passed by me. The stress level had hit the roof, one of our major sponsors in the walk might just be pulling out, the kids are nuts as can be running wild and crazy!
This plan will require living more sparsely in Denver (at least, that’s what I keep telling myself; it usually ends up being an excuse to buy new furniture)…but the smaller space and higher costs of Denver living will make less-ness necessary. And that can be good, too.
In a competitive market, businesses have to produce what consumers want at a low price, and inefficient firms go out of business. In a competitive political system, parties have to deliver what voters want, and unpopular parties lose office. To avoid a defeat, politicians have to improve their performance. That’s how the theory goes. In our democracy, parties were really afraid of losing. So instead of improving their performance, our politicians tried to rig the system any which way they could. This I contend was the fundamental flaw in our political system. We had a system where the logical thing for the ruling party was to bend every rule to coerce the opposition, and the opposition’s best strategy was to obstruct the government every step of the way — we had a system that made peaceful co-existence very difficult.
Garcia
Practice.
A flower on the windowsill
Hello Copic fans!
Two days later, CAO Ann Pappert said that she was going to release the report anyway.
- Not making false promises, or promises that I know cannot be fulfilled but are made just to make me feel good
Here are my favorite Holiday Movies!
Reasons for Sending Your Kids to Public School
General Casey told me on This Week that he’s worried that diversity could become another victim of Thursday’s mass killing at Ft. Hood. The incident was not the first case of fratricide by a Muslim and when I asked how the military plans to deal with this potential problem in its ranks, Casey said, “Speculation could potentially heighten backlash against some of our Muslim soldiers and what happened at Fort Hood was a tragedy, but I believe it would be an even greater tragedy if our diversity becomes a casualty here. It’s not just about Muslims, we have a very diverse army, we have very diverse society and that gives us all strength. But again we need to be very careful about that.”
And that’s fair; no one needs to claim that he’s being irrational on purpose, I don’t think.
Well, the truth is...no one is really right or wrong in this situation. Reading is a subjective experience. What may rub one reader the wrong way will totally tickle the fancy of another. This is a NO WIN game. You're never going to be able to please everyone. The only thing you CAN control is satisfying yourself and feeling confident that you've analyzed and broken down each and every comment and taken or discarded all of them in the vein of trying to make your book the best it can be.
You Speak My Language, Morphine (I still miss Mark Sandman)
insects to the dark areas where their mouths and nostrils
Changing my mood
What if she were to change her default setting to Maybe? Not the kind of Maybe that really means No. Not the dismissive Maybe Later, when Later will never actually come. The kind of Maybe that means all possibilities will be considered, and that the answer will sometimes be Yes. A child asks for something in the grocery store...
There is no question McKnight reveres NT Wright for his scholarship and the view Wright has taken on many issues related to the gospel. Wright, after all, is quoted several times in The King Jesus Gospel. Wright, for his part, could easily say that McKnight has started this conversation down the right path. (One wonders whether McKnight’s book was the motivator for How God Became King.) Nevertheless, probably each would say of the other he goes too far in certain areas, not far enough in others.
Well, I've got to go fix some dinner.
4,i like the cracked glass and sparkle on this one.
- Immediately spoon the batter into the pan and slide the baking sheet(s) into the oven. Bake for 1 hour and 25 to 30 minutes (1 hour and 10 minutes for a Bundt pan), or until a thin knife inserted into the center of the cake comes out dry and free of crumbs. (Check the cake at the 40-minute mark. If it is browning quickly, cover it loosely with a foil tent for the remainder of the baking period.) Remove the cake from the oven and allow it to cool for about 10 minutes on a cooling rack before turning it out of the pan; invert and cool to room temperature right side up.
Sometimes I don't even know why a person piques my interest, such as when I honored toupee-wearing, five-minutes-a-week PBS astronomer Jack Horkheimer. Even for me, that's idiosyncratic!
How this relates to Characters.
This is a tough one as my immediate reaction is to tell you that Provence is a wonderful place to visit at any time of the year. You know I am biased when it comes to Provence... the mere hint that someone is thinking of coming and I can't wax lyrical enough... so for this series I will try and be practical and pragmatic...
2) Distribute half the cards to each player.
Previous raiding experience:
“The 21st century is a critical period for people and the planet,” the Royal Society, the world’s oldest science academy, said in a report ahead of the June 20-22 UN gathering.
I would have bailed out. Knowing myself, I would have tried to escape from this situation. I’d have insensitively left you to deal with everything by yourself as you know it’s a ticking time bomb you have created for yourself anyway. I get infatuated as fast as I get disillusioned, so yeah, I would have normally bailed out.
I first saw it yesterday afternoon when I friend of mine alerted me to it on Twitter. She knows who she is, but I'm not giving her name at the moment, as it would help in at least narrowing down the line the picture was taken from.
“Well, well, well,” he begins, invoking crowd hatred. “Look who’s on top of the heap now. And I’m not just talking about your fat mommas!”
A friend of mine has been having a little trouble at the gym. She's young, attractive and a target for the juice heads and horn dogs who believe the men's magazines that say a health club is a great place to hook up.
You know how to express the song when you're carrying the pain of centuries with you. The Gypsy who knows how to do this gets it from his ancestors...These are real experiences which have accumulated within him...He suffers them; he lives them; he remembers all his own.
The relationship that I just ended was so not any of those things. What makes me angry, though, is that I didn't take notice. I mean, that's the point of all of the counseling that I've done. To be able to recognize when my needs are not being met, to know when something is unhealthy, yet I did not realize it fully until I was away from it. In addition to that, more realization came when I met someone who treats me the way I want, need and deserve to be treated.
“If everyone demanded peace instead of another television set, then there’d be peace.” ~John Lennon
Explain to them what the world is like in other parts of the world. Explain to them how women in Saudi Arabia cannot go outside their home unless they are accompanied by their husband or a male relative. Explain to them that in Iran they have "clothing police" that go around beating and arresting women if their ankles show. Explain to them that in Iran, Pakistan, Saudi Arabia, and Somalia, if a woman is raped, she is usually jailed and sometimes stoned to death for "fornication." Encourage them to watch Osama the movie and Not Without My Daughter.
I also discovered that with the help of the inspired words from Kim Klassen in Beyond Layers, my selfies have taken on a new meaning. I am expressing my self-discovery photographically.
I constantly rave about how being a Daring Kitchen member lets you try out things you would never have done before. Maybe that is especially true for this month's challenge.
The pop-up is currently in 'soft open' mode, Thursdays 5-9pm (mirroring former Farmers Market hours) and Saturdays 10am-2pm, but they hope to expand hours as business ramps up. They will be officially up and running starting October 31st.
Having suffered a migraine earlier in the day, I head to bed earlier than usual.
where there was a party going on, and, as I passed that house, I was
All entries will be verified. We welcome emails and entries from everyone; however, free shipping of the Weekly Wednesday Giveaway is included for the winner to the 48 contiguous United States only. For any locations outside this area, the winner is responsible for arranging and paying their own shipping costs. If you purchase a Weekly Wednesday Giveaway item during the giveaway and win, we will send you an additional item or issue you a refund for the product you purchased - whichever you prefer.
Quiet Sun Threat
I tried to pincurl my hair, but the back refused to cooperate, so into a chignon it went. *bah* I also didn't have a hat that I really liked for this outfit, but that problem was solved beautifully when I picked up this little $7 beauty at the antique mall after the fashion show.
The Bellingham Herald – Seven black teens have been arrested on suspicion that they committed a hate crime when they attacked a 15-year-old Hispanic boy while he was walking home from school in Southern California, according to the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department.
Could manipulation also be a cultural matter? On one angle, one would argue that it isn’t. Yet another would say that it is; when you think of match making. While it does happen in western cultures, it’s like almost LAW in Asian cultures. Many parents try matching their children with persons they feel is “the one” for them. And if successful, the two persons get married, have children, so forth and so on. Might even stay together until death, but it doesn’t mean the marriage is fruitful. The stick-to-it-ness is mainly for the children. Yet there’s a great amount of issues involved: such as infidelity, physical, verbal and/or emotional abuse, lack of communication, etc. And while these things may happen, one must remember that perspectives concerning the handling of marital matters are different in every culture, and also varies from person to person.
I fall somewhere between. I use what I call a slap-dash outline, one that describes only the chapters immediately ahead of me. This allows me to maintain the spontaneity of discovery, yet provides a compass that points me in the general direction I need to go.
"Probably whoever came for him." Pevan thought for a moment. "I'll follow it up once we know the town's safe."
Loved the bamboo-ness, but the pillows were hideous. I dropped them off at the upholsterers on Saturday, to be covered in a fabric I found at Forsyth Fabrics. I was going to do leopard printed pillows for the sofa, but I already bought the refurbished kilim rug pillow for the sofa, and I didn't want to have 3 pillows on the sofa (overkill- guests would always have to be moving them), so I decided to do the pillow for this chair in a cute leopard. Leopard is the new neutral...
Then Boyfriend says "What's on your face?" And I'm like "IT'S HONEY! GET OUT OF YOUR FUCKING TOWER AND STOP ACTING LIKE YOU'VE NEVER HAD HONEY ON YOUR FACE BEFORE!!!" And Boyfriend is like "What?" And I'm all "DON'T JUDGE ME!" And I run away.
Jason Maguire
“See, a fundamental change happened to the Super Mario formula when 64 came out. Consider every 2D masterpiece from SMB to Yoshi’s Island. Even though they were short games they each had a sort of cohesion in that their respective worlds had a feeling of continuity, that all of these paths and buildings in a game existed in their respective “Mushroom Kingdom”.
“I don’t know if that’s enough for me. What are we fighting for?”
8. He puts his butt up in the air and wags his tail to entice me to either throw a ball or chase after him.
Colonial white ric-rac
The girls got them out earlier this week and finished them off. Needless to say it was a messy job, but they look beautiful hanging up on the window. Here are some of the girls' designs. One day I might get around to finishing my Mondrian style design.
Till we feel the far track humming,
The biscotti I have made , it is hard work when cutting into thin slices but when I have succeed in it, I felt so much of satisfaction and accomplishment in it. I didn't give up and the end result of this is really good because of the crunch when biting.
Jupiter is a favorite sight in small telescopes – and to see the four Gallilean moons you really should use a telescope – any telescope. I have a tiny, 50mm “department store” telescope that mounted on an ordinary camera tripod does an excellent job showing the moons of Jupiter. It is possible to see them with binoculars if you have good eyesight and can hold the binoculars really steady – lean against a building, or better yet, mount them on a tripod.
Attached to that rustic post is an even more rustic gate. MJ used to enjoy playing with this gate, opening and closing it for fun. It never really served a purpose to keep him in. The fence didn’t go all the way across the barnyard.
With an aroma that suggests pine trees that have been dusted with a light powder coating of sulphur, the the first sip is surprisingly sweet, delivering a fruity, yeasty taste up front. This leads a sweet, bready charge, followed by a soft floral-infused bitterness. The finish is dry, while retaining those sweet elements, and has a lingering pine note. It's not a bad beer, but I got bored with it. I got the impression that it being "breadier" than most pilsners around these parts rounded it out a bit, but perhaps too much. Not quite Sehr Gut, in my humble opinion.
A bright orange
Fandom: Avengers (2012), Thor (2011)
“The amazing thing is that, as I grow in this program, I find less and less to be angry about.” — For Today, p. 90”
I walked across a bridge with a view of a dam. Sun worshipers were sprawled upon the concrete, hastening the onset of skin cancer. I strolled up and down narrow streets, most just wide enough for one car to pass, with sidewalks only a foot and a half wide. I saw tourists galore, Indians, Japanese, German, American, young, old, awed, bored.
2.Earthless - 02:43
USB Network Adapters The easiest way to connect your desktop or notebook to a wireless network at up to 54Mbps, without opening the case. Connect your USB-equipped desktop or notebook computer to a wireless network at incredible speeds with the Linksys Compact Wireless-G USB Adapter. By incorporating USB 2.0 and Wireless-G the Adapter delivers data rates up to 54Mbps (5 times as fast as 802.11b), without the trouble of opening up the case of your desktop computer., Brand CiscoSimply plug-and-play operation to connect PCs wirelessly to networksSupports USB 2.0 with up to 54 Mbps, high-speed data transfer rate with automatic fallbackCompatible with Windows XP, Vista, and Vista 64-bit editionSupports up to 128-bit WEP and WPA encryption securityCompatible with 802.11g and 802.11b (2.4GHz) standards
And here is the belly bump at 12 weeks. Kinda looks like a beer belly to me, but somewhere in there is a peach-sized Felix. I have not started to feel better yet. Grrr. I am still super tired and VERY VERY nauseous and occasionally I vomit profusely. TMI? Let's all hope this passes soon. On the plus side, Felix must be a girl because I know I never felt this lousy when I was pregnant with the boys. I know this, because had I felt this bad, we would only have had Jack. Seriously. An interesting side effect to this pregnancy has been my total aversion to all things sweet. Cookies, cake, ice cream, chocolate- blech! I think this is very strange.
Hello Peeps !!!
Bin Laden agreed with the proposal and a courier was dispatched to Iraqi. But unknown to bin Laden, the courier also carried a letter from Zawahiri detailing bin Laden's condition and requesting Iraqi's help in convincing him to retire voluntarily for his own safety. The courier returned from visiting Iraqi in September 2003 with cosmetic modifications of the plan, and with the advice that the shura had requested: bin Laden should be housed in a secure location from which he could issue orders, but Zawahiri should continue to act on bin Laden's behalf in the day-to-day affairs of the organization.
Also, now Mom and I have a new challenge, a puzzle: Taking apart and then putting back together our story. (Duhn, duhn, duhn, duh!) Otherwise known as, REVISIONS.
But Arthur felt the Templars was his calling, and no-one argues with Arthur SanGreal.
The Nelson region is renowned for it’s good weather, and our week here was no exception; although we made a few trips (Golden Bay/Farewell Spit and Nelson on market day) we also had plenty of time to just kick back and relax. We had freedom to roam around the farm, so we explored the hills and rivers, walked through the stream, chatted with the cows (much to their disgust) and watched the sun, and the rainbows, come and go. The old Matariki school house sits in the grounds; it’s been disused since 1942, but the door was open so we went in to explore, with plenty of it’s history recorded and preserved inside, and we took pleasure in finding our hosts family listed amongst the students.
And put them here. All at once. A window to many years at one time. Seems so neat to me.
March 16
therefore I'm also planning to work out at the gym.
population so they do not
Another way to confirm a major top is to check if sentiment has reached historically extreme levels. If instead sentiment indicators have peaked at lower levels then a major market top is unlikely. Based on these two key variables, Hulbert concludes that we can’t rule out that the May top will mark a ceiling for prices for some time.
everyone can hear, in defense of freedom, equality before the law, and
Verve - Sip & Savor stamp set
Roberts calling them the “Roman editors” no more implies that they are “working with and have the endorsement of Rome” than calling Roberts an “Anglican author” means that he had some official mandate or endorsement from the Anglican church. Especially in nineteenth century documents, Roman is just shorthand for “Roman Catholic”, with perhaps a slight pejorative twist. It’s absurd for Bob to claim that it implies some sort of official mandate from Rome.
and acknowledging that those grids
A few nights ago I was shown a page full of “keep on truckin’” quotes. (To be honest I think it was actually “hang in there,” but I desperately wanted to use the word “truckin’”). It was full of good quotes, many of them inspirational, some of them funny, all of them positive. I read through them with a smile on my face.
:: held babies that aren't mine and felt amazing amounts of love...
I was teaching classes in the gym at the end of town and also a fantastic class that I was blessed to teach on a beautiful wooden deck on the beach at La Sirena.
Now I would enter this card in the Less is More challenge where the theme is Masking but, since I've already entered three cards this week, Mandi and Chrissie will be fed up with seeing me I'm sure! Why don't you go and enter a card there instead?!
Two years later, almost to the day, I woke up with some spotting. I was 15 weeks pregnant. I rang the hospital where I was booked and hit a wall, they kept telling me it was normal to spot after sex despite my insistance that I hadn't had sex recently. In frustration I went to my GP and even he couldn't get them to see me, he had to refer me to a different hospital who slotted me in for the following morning at their ante-natal clinic. The sonographer did the scan then sighed and left the room. I lay there with my pants pulled low, lower belly covered in gel, and no idea what was going on. A short while later a midwife came in, rescanned me, and then explained that my baby had died at 14 weeks. Surgery wasn't recommended for a late miscarriage and their policy was to use medical management. I was booked at yet another hospital for this as they didn't have the facilities for managing a late miscarriage. The day of the second round of pills I found that I was on an ante-natal ward, the only small mercy being that I had a room to myself complete with en suite - a friend had the same treatment on the same day at the third local hospital and had to share a four bed bay. I was expected to insert my own pessary to begin the process but I wasn't told what to expect after that. I don't want to be graphic about it, not because I want to shy away from the issue but because the memory of it still reduces me to tears. What followed were the most traumatic six hours of my life culminating in me having my baby while alone in the bathroom, pulling on the red alarm cord and getting no response for almost thirty minutes. By the time they came I was semi-hysterical and bleeding heavily. They laughed and said "everyone cries when it's over" and took the baby away in a bed pan covered over with toilet tissue. They didn't come back. There was a shift change an hour or so afterwards and the new nurse assigned to me came in, she asked if I wanted to see my baby and spend some time saying goodbye, I found that I did. She brought her to me wrapped in a swatch of blanket and lying in a tiny little baby nest. To the earlier staff she was just a 14 week old foetus, retained products of conception, to me she was my baby. She had the smallest hands I've ever seen.
We started out by stopping at the Visitor's Center at Apgar to pick up a National Parks passport (we've never had one before, but with the high hopes of visiting quite a few parks while we're out here, we thought it was time to start) and get our first (and later, our second) stamp We also picked up a Junior Ranger Booklet for Sierra. The Junior Ranger requirements are slightly different at different parks, but at Glacier, she had to do 6 worksheets that helped her learn about Glacier National Park and attend 1 ranger-led activity to complete the program.
A 14-page analysis by the Republican majority staff of the House Armed Services Committee says the cumulative cuts will result in Army and Marine Corps losing 200,000 troops.
When she collapses in Portersfield, Texas, exhausted, ill, and hungry, Sheriff Cory Muldoon finds her and takes her to the doctor. Against Cory’s better judgment, Seth and Erin Winston take her in and offer her a job as a nanny for their young son. As a minister, Seth sees it as his duty to take care of her. As a deputy, Cory needs to know the truth about her even as he is attracted to the waif of a young woman.
And if you feel like sharing a little of your hazy, crazy (or lazy!) August with us, please drop us a little note - we'd love to hear from you.
Although their activities might still be secret, the NSA is now far from being a secret organization. They almost seem to delight in showing us their strength as witnessed by the two billion dollar facility they are building in Bluffdale, Utah. This Utah Data Center will be fully operational before the end of 2013, and then the last vestige of our privacy will be gone.
Place the fish in a baking pan in a single layer. Mix the remaining ingredients together and pour over the fish. Marinate for 30 minutes. Bake at 350°F for 20-30 minutes until the fish is flaky.
Kiwi
"Yes, it's broken," the pretty young doctor said said, "but not badly."
10. Prescription drugs reduce the livers effectiveness at removing caffeine from the body
I called my mother, who babysits two days a week despite living in Assachusetts. Could she switch her babysitting days of Thursday and Friday for Wednesday and Thursday? She said no, then apologized 50 times. She volunteered for Meals on Wheels, and if she rescheduled again, the director was going to kill her. But I should call her if I got into a jam.
Today was our first day of shooting the film Cornelis. It is a film about a Dutch immigrant to Sweden who ends up becoming a folk music hero and living a rock and roll lifestyle and eventually crashing and burning professionally as an old man but not before he makes things right with his boy. It's apparently touching and moving and very important to Swedes and other assorted European types who loved the man's music. I am going to listen to some of his music if I can find it on iTunes.
In the Figure 1 above its obvious “at a glance” that the majority of the revenue of this business unit is derived from product lines that are in decline in terms of market CAGR. It’s important to note, however, that the product lines in these markets with negative CAGR are the “cash cows” of the portfolio. This highlights a problem for the business unit that sets the context that everyone gets in an instant. Once we have completed this matrix we are ready to build the product life-cycle graph.
When researching for a story I published on the lack of affordability of SA tertiary education, I realised just how few South Africans achieve high school education, let alone higher education.
And then, an email comes addressed to Mom101.
Uggggggh. I need to stop doing this to myself. It’s not helping matters. At all. But I do miss him. I’d be lying if I said I didn’t.
7) In one of the sessions yesterday, one of the moderator’s phone rang (loud enough for everyone to hear). Maybe not a big deal, but something for moderators to think about – rules apply to them too!
Just a quick apology for the lack of posts recently; I'm feeling a tad overwhelmed on the work side of things.
I stamped the puppy with black ink on Kraft cardstock and cut him out. The birdie was stamped directly onto the Fabriano notecard and coloured with Copics. The pink paper is by My Mind's Eye and the ledger paper can be found here .
and like a sheep that before its shearers is silent,
Brief Synopsis: The International Space Corps are on the trail of a buch of Argonite Pirates.
You are reassured when you hear police sirens, because it means that the police are actually out and about.
Okay, this might get complicated … Andy had received the Sunshine Award and the Hug Award and gave it as a combined award, adopting the Sunshine Awards rules format, which says:
But the fact is that these are the same sorts of men who got us into this mess in the first place. A reasonable assumption would be that they're wedded to the status quo and will do everything in their power to keep it going. The first impulse of Hank Paulson, the former Treasury Secretary and former CEO of Goldman, was to bail out the banks.
We live in a fallen world. No one’s faith journey is perfect. Even Paul struggled with this. He talked about it in Romans 7: “I do not understand what I do. For what I want to do I do not do, but what I hate I do.” Romans 7:15, NIV
Anyway…I had my faithful bartending friend, Calvin, thoroughly demonstrate how to open open a bottle of wine, TWICE. He handed me the wine opener and there I went, smushing the corkscrew so ineptly into the cork it began to look like it had gone through a wood chipper. After I had finally gotten the screw into the depth of the cork, I began pulling with all of my Jewish strength away from the bottle. I looked like a guy who got his dick stuck in a Chinese finger trap.
When I was invited to help co-host the #CookieLove Blog Hop for December, I was both flattered to be considered, and, quite frankly, terrified to accept because, well, I'm a cook, not a baker. And cookies are very different from cakes and pies. I can follow a cookie recipe, but to develop one is not exactly something I felt I could do. I thought about it and nearly decided to decline, but then I realized that this could be a fun challenge, one where I could step into a different category within the subject I love, and conquer a fear. So, I accepted and immediately began working out several cookie recipes, desperately hoping I could actually do it without just ultimately showcasing already published recipes all month long (which is usually what I end up baking at my house during the holiday season).
Can’t wait!
Of course, one important thing to remember about Leo's style is the way in which it evolved constantly throughout his career - something that his more slavish imitators (amongst whom, to be fair, I don't count Dave!) never managed.
Next it was my son who took care of the house, or lack there of, while we were gone. He's 21 years old. And you'd think under the circumstances, he could have had the house partially clean. Of course not, my fault bad mothering.
Come back in shining shapes at last to spoil his last carouse:
God speaks through circumstances in our lives. He’ll open or close a door. Did I get this opportunity just because or did God just open a door? Is this testing me, or is the door shut? This is tricky to discern sometimes, but know this: things don’t just HAPPEN. I just tried to come up with a really good example but couldn’t, because fact: sometimes we don’t know why something went the way it did, but God ALWAYS has a plan. We just have to trust God with that. Oh, here’s one: I enjoy writing, but it’s not my major. Some people have told me I should consider doing that, because I have a gift for it or something, but I’m going to finish my major with where I’m at. But I’m not sure if I will or how long I will be able to do the job of my major (band teacher), because of my physical limitations. But the window is open. =)
in site planning the first consideration will be the arrangement of the buildings and the development of the site to the best advantage, whereas in town planning the first consideration must be the general convenience of the town, and the arrangement of the main roads. When the main roads have been laid down and the main traffic requirements have been provided for, the spaces left between these through roads can be developed more from the point of view of making the best of the sites for the buildings, and less from the point of view of public convenience….
Deserter, Splashdown - I’ve loved Deserter for a long time, and it captures the essence of Joy’s story. I wanted to use it for the trailer soundtrack but it was a bit too melodic so we used Splashdown’s “Need Vs. Want” instead (Splashdown members are also friends, and they generously gave us permission!)
They also believe that no one should pick you up if you fall down. If you fall, you fall. Too bad, better luck next life. They don’t believe that society should step in to pick up people who have stumbled in life for whatever reason. No safety net, zero, nada.
If Kimberly Williams were the only star in “Father of the Bride,” (did you notice the correct capitalization of the movie’s title?) then the comma would be correct. But she wasn’t and it isn’t.
While a couple may only have two children, supposedly just replacing themselves, there is no way to control how many children their children will have, and so on. For example: If a couple were to have two children and those children in turn have 3 children each and those children in turn have 3 children each, that couple could claim responsibility for producing 26 offspring in just 3 generations. If all those offspring were to eat today’s Standard American Diet, they would be consuming over 2,600 animals every year or nearly 200,000 animals over their lifetimes.
The history of the place and the tragedy that happened here are well known. The compound was built in the 1880′s and bought by the Hoffman family at the turn of the century. In the 1920′s, they ran a camp for boys there. One night, one of the Hoffman family tortured and murdered five boys who were staying there, then hanged himself. All were buried in the family cemetery which is on the grounds. The Hoffman family lived in the mansion until 1960, when it was bought by a family from California. They lived there for several years, then abruptly packed up and moved, never to return. The main house and several other structures were condemned and demolished in 1998 after over 30 years of abandonment and neglect.
In/Significant Others 2009 Hollywood Movie Watch Online : Movshare Link : Alternative Link :
(sobbing, swallowing) Jeremy. He died, Hijita.
that have decided to drop in here from time to time
Metroid Prime 3: Corruption 2
Today, I want to talk about keeping our kids safe.
Dawn breaks open
This cornbread is very lightly sweetened....I like to add sweetness with a bit of butter and gobs of honey.
And I haven't!!
This is a favorite pie in the family...Enjoy
LtoR: Tina's, Caleb's, Mom's, Logan's, Roman's, and Daddy's
Thompson's misgivings about the radical youth of the 1960s and '70s reflect a broader unease with the world of the second half of the twentieth century. Thompson saw the period from the outbreak of the Spanish Civil War until the defeat of Hitler as a 'decade of heroes', when the creation of a new and better world was a real possibility, but felt that history had taken a wrong turn in the postwar decades. The pot smoking Baby Boomer students were only one aspect of a generalised decline.
The people of Jerusalem and Judea, the senate, and Judas send greetings and good wishes to Aristobulus, teacher of King Ptolemy and member of the family of the anointed priests, and to the Jews in Egypt.
Our public policy process is ever an imperfect one, necessarily producing messy outcomes because of the compromises necessary between conflicting perspectives. But even by these standards, it is rare for policy makers to inflict as much damage as is being done with the payroll tax cut. If lawmakers cannot muster the will to terminate it now, one must hope that they are able to do so before it goes on too much longer.
#31 Smoked Duck Crepe Rolls
MOM: “Hey, I don’t want to go either, but it’s either that or we’re eating cream of onion-ketchup soup and drinking Italian dressing for dinner tonight.”
Near Zennor; Elizabeth Hand (A Book of Horrors, Jo Fletcher Books)
But there's been a change in the flight plan. They've landed in Holland and there you must stay.
E being away isn't just tough on me, I know the kids take it hard too. The money and the commute of 4+ hours every week each way is too much for E also.
The Diva Runs Out of Thyme by Krista Davies First in the Domestic Divas mystery series, starring Sophie Winston, forty-something divorcee living in a fabulous old house in Georgetown, who becomes embroiled in a murder investigation when she finds a dead man in a dumpster at the grocery store. A dead man who turns out to have been a private investigator who was following her. Enjoyable mystery, with amusing ending with overtones of slapstick comedy. I was particularly enjoying this mystery because Sophie and her sidekick do what is rare in amateur detective novels--they tell the police what they've found, or at least try to. I found it refreshing that Sophie didn't think she was smarter than the detective (to whom, of course, she's very attracted; ditto him to her). Until Sophie found the poison vial and instead of calling the police, decided--stupidly--to try to catch the killer (of several people) herself. Very out of character with a woman who, up til this point in the story, was acting like a normal person. Disappointed this reader. I know, you'll say the author needed this to resolve the mystery. Well, I liked Sophie a lot up til then, and I instantly lost respect for her acting stupid. Which made me forget forgiving her being wishy-washy and unable to tell Humphrey that no, they were not on a date, and no, they were not involved romantically (this relationship was too junior high to be believed) and get annoyed by that whole subplot. Enjoyable enough I'll give Sophie another try, but if this smart amateur detective suddenly has another stupid moment, I'll be mightily disappointed. Lots of food talk in this mystery, and it made me eager for Thanksgiving dinner.
12-23-2008
I structured my courses to provide practical experience in each of these areas, mixing primary and secondary source material on the various topics under consideration and emphasizing in lecture and discussion the connection between explanatory narratives of the past with that evidence. I increasingly sought to include a wide variety of media as part of the source-based building blocks of my courses (texts, film, photographs, artifacts, etc.). My hope for each of my courses has been that students will leave with a keen sense of the problematic relationship between the present and the past and of the problematic nature of the relationship between information and knowledge.
Why do you keep
These matches will also be a bit of a test for the selectors – will they gave players like Cooper a chance, or will they go back to the likes of Shaun Marsh and Phil Hughes?
Me: Yeah, I know. I see them all the time in the cheesy chick flicks I watch at night. *Exaggerated sigh*
Today I find I have come up against resisting everything. I know we all do this. We are invited to a birthday party. We love the person who invited us, yet, do you really want to be sociable with a bunch of people you don’t know at a birthday party? I get inspired by dreams people want to create, I support you fully in living your dreams. You deserve the help you need. But do I really want to step forward & help?
Viollet-le-Duc is best known for resurrecting Notre Dame from the ruin it had become by the mid 19th century but he also had his hands in a lot of other projects including the restoration of Carcassone in the southwest corner of France and the renovation of Pierrefonds, a castle just north of Paris, that became an occasional residence of Napoleon III. Pierrefonds got its start in the 14th century as a military fortress guarding routes between Flanders and Burgundy. In 1616, Cardinal Richelieu had it destroyed since it was always in the hands of those pesky Protestants. It lay in shambles for centuries until Viollet-le-Duc was commissioned to bring it back to life. And he did so in a manner that he imagined to be true to its medieval origins but ended up being more fantastic and over the top than scholars now believe to be accurate.
Choosing a location
I'll be using the book depository to purchase said book, so the contest is open internationally as long as they ship to your country.
